WINNER: The California Teacher’s Union (D) @ 8:21
Feeding the Dragon: A Culinary Travelogue Through China with Recipes
Tinatago ka ba, or Nagtatago ka? Baka pangit ka? – Ben Dinglas.
Representative Adam Kinzinger
Our sarcastic motto for our troop leader was "Swab the leaves!"
"WRONG GENRE! THIS IS NOT CLASSICAL MUSIC! THIS IS ROCK FOR GOD SAKE!"
Have you noticed the clever way Tracy has dotted in the names of each character around their ornament? Loads of details to love in this art journal spread, be sure to stop by and tell Tracy how you like it!
**This serves 4 people (generously) with plenty left over for meatloaf sandwiches the next day. Yummm! I still make the entire recipe when it's only the two of us. I just divide it in half and place the second loaf on a cookie sheet and put it in the freezer until it's frozen through. When it's completely frozen, I'll put the additional loaf in a large zip-top bag and pop it back into the freezer for another meal at a later time!
The cover was battered,
These doubts were short-lived. As soon as we were safely in the confines of the car and out of her teacher's earshot, Betty turned on me: 'Why are you here Mummy? I was really looking forward to going on the bus with my friends, you've ruined it now'. 'There is always tomorrow,' I reasoned. 'Tomorrow is too far away,' she retorted stroppily. She made me promise I wouldn't do it again, and it took a KitKat bribe to get her to be nice to me again.
Previously, I did mentioned on how close I can approach to a dragonfly with “Loving kindness and NO HARM” in my mind for photo taking.
10.- Politics - Produced by Tonedeff
I am so excited to feature the new and innovative Spellbinders M-Bossabilities folders! These are unique reversible folders, with 2 separate yet coordinated embossing patterns for twice the designs and double the value! The folders simply flip over, so easy to use! There are 20 new folders, each with 2 designs, and they come in 2 sizes, 5 x 7” and 4 ¼ x 5 ½” for all your paper crafting needs!
But the guys over at One Minute Apologist have done a video with renowned Christian apologist, Dr. Michael Brown, asking the question this post centers around: should the Church ask for forgiveness from gays? (Spoiler alert: the answer Dr. Brown gives is yes.
CVBDE Blog (cvbdeblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
AND THEN HE’S STANDING FAR AWAY FROM GAI WITH INROI’S FUCKING VOID
A less common, but often much more expensive, vanity anthology scheme is the pay-to-play anthology. In this version of the scheme, writers must pay upfront for inclusion in the anthology, usually by buying large numbers of finished books or other merchandise.
Unfortunately, there is one thing holding this game back from being my players first choice. Even though I am sure I could convince them to choose amongst four classes and races, there would be lots of overlap, and they immediately pointed out that they prefer the huge range of character classes and races that 4e offers. This alone sways the argument in favor of 4e. The full Pathfinder experience might close the gap of races and classes, but then we are adding the complexity of 3e mechanics back into the game, by which I mean opportunity attacks mainly, and the avalanche of feats, secondarily. So in the end Pathfinder Beginner Box was an amazing experience, with lots of potential, but its elegant simplicity is marred by the lack of character options todays players like to see. 4 and 4 is just not enough – or 5 counting the online addition of the beginner barbarian.
Frying food
It’s not too much of a spoiler, given the book’s title and the cover tagline, “How do you solve your own murder?” to reveal that Eva spends a lot of the book trying to find out who is responsible for her death.
Like Nobodies Business II (...And the World Files For Chapter 11), Pezmosis Music Productions (2006)
Williams Brothers Brewing Company Fraoch Heather Ale
“The healing begins…when we see our pain, not as separating us, but connecting us with our Maker (Bell, 2007).”
Sorry the pic is blurry.
It seeks a new form when the old one is gone;
Besides the main healing session I'll be doing regular unscheduled energy adjustments leading up to Feb. 3 for those who intend to join before the main session. People can begin to notice effects of the energy adjustments soon after intending to join. Sensitive people can feel the effects of this adjustment period strongly before the main session. Here are comments from people who felt the energy working soon after intending to join.
Hell no. It got some good reviews critically so I checked it out. It was the worst thing I saw this year. Its attempt to be a horror show came off as silly. The acting was awful to boot. Let this one die.
Of all the Hawkwind albums, this has to be the most musically ambitious and progressive - in the genre sense - of their entire discography; and as an album; a singular piece of work; a whole, complete product; it could well be their masterpiece.
Red Album Project
It has been a fair day today but it is getting colder tonight.
There is also my Family History Project. Before my grandmother died, and my father's brothers and cousin, I interviewed them after I had attended an Oral History course with the Alexander Turnbull Library. I got a lot of invaluable material about where I came from, and discovered how interesting some of my family members were. Also, I have a collection of family photos, going back to my great grandparents' wedding in the 19th century, and a few strange things such as a book which belonged to my paternal grandfather, a pair of his braces, and a beautiful china teapot that my maternal grandparents brought with them from England. This needs to be tidily stored but not somewhere susceptible to damp. Actually I rarely need to access it as extended family never comes over (on account of them living in the North Island) and my daughter and I are not that interested any more. If it is all arranged neatly though, perhaps the responsibility for storing it can be offered to another family member.
be willing to make corrections. I do this all the time. I tend to be a tad opinionated but will be the
I have a few objectives with this site:
Imagine my surprise when a local pub tweeted that they had it on draught!
It is with great sadness that we announce the passing of Vidal Sassoon CBE, who died this morning at his home in Los Angeles surrounded by loved ones. The 84-year-old hairdresser was born in 1928 and sadly lost his battle with leukaemia today. He became the most celebrated hairdresser in the world having begun his career as an apprentice during the Second World War, going on to revolutionise an industry through his iconic haircuts, salons, schools and product lines. He will be greatly missed by his wife of 20 years Ronnie, his children, grandchildren, family and friends.
Why do I have this much sour cream?
You can spend little to no money by having a date at home with that special someone. Put the kids to bed early and the two of you can be all alone.
False doctrine and statements will damage their way of thinking, ruin their bright future and exploratory life that they deserve as youth. I can’t imagine what this country will turn out to be in the next few years when these kind of youth who used to be anarchy lead the country. As an educator, it is of our responsibility to educate pupils to not be tense and anarchist in judging or commenting on something which they do not comprehend very well.
The balance of my love
they reach the Meatballs...
So three Giants relics, as this Lincecum card was in the first hobby pack of Gypsy Queen that I opened. I think any Mets fan might be looking for a new team to follow - especially if they don't find a way to sign David Wright after this season... I think THAT would be the ultimate slap in the face to those of us who have stuck with the team, watching game after game in some tough years.
I never expected to have views from that area.
Several weeks ago, I hired a coach to help keep me disciplined in specific areas of my life I deem important. We’ve had interesting conversations about dreams, goals, and mostly he has helped me take a view of things not just from the surface but from an “elevation of 20,000 feet.” It’s given me a new perspective on the totality of life.
Rona's Home Page
Some pelted down like shooting stars; others drifted upwards for one final pirouette before landing softly on the ground. It was so beautiful and to my delight it was sticking to the ground, creating a clean white blanket across my garden.
Which leads me to one of the decisions I have to make: where am I going to live when the inevitable happens? I sure as hell am not staying around here. Don’t get me wrong, I absolutely LOVE Florida. I just know that I don’t want to be around those who continue to bring me down emotionally acting like they care when really they don’t. I could be wrong in this but the actions as of late have pointed in that direction. So, I will repeat here what I posted on my FB last night:
I lost it. It was ugly. I was ugly. I yelled at the dog. I got mad. I yelled at the kids, who were defending the dog. ("Mom, she's old - she can't help it.") The kids were crying. The dog was hiding. I was on my knees at 10:30 p.m. on a Saturday night with Resolve and a rag, scrubbing pee stains out of our rug.
We shall be sister blogs, always sharing the little adventures we are constantly having with each other.
“Down the hall, to the left,” I said.
Ever wondered what happens to your legal downloads once you die? Not yet, eh? You should consider a few things, and they are mentioned in this article.
Valentino: The Last Emperor
Prayer: Lord, help me be patient with all of your people and know when it is time to be quiet and wait for You to save them, as only You can do. I ask this, as always, in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the holy Spirit. Amen.
In my eyes, Palin endorsed Handel solely because she's a woman. (Pet peeve here: Handel's signs are green. Come on lady, really!? When do you ever see the guy with the green sign win?)
Recorded in New York, on June 11 & 12, 1957
Princess Panya,my new friend!
I fought my attraction to paper piecing with these stamp sets for a long time. If I gave in to this desire, I knew it would be the beginning of a downward spiral into collecting 6x6 designer paper pads - the smaller prints are just too perfect for paper piecing the small stamp images. If I gave into this desire, who knew where it would end? Would it end??!!!
PROVERBS 27:17 As iron sharpens iron, so people can improve each other.
Is there any distinction between socialism and communism? I believe there’s none. A system that abolishes individual rights and makes men the means to the ends of others and the state would only lead to the rise of a dictator. The Leftists were also heavily hypnotized by Karl Marx’s evil lie that communism is different from socialism. The only difference between these two great lies is the number of deaths and the degree of man’s enslavement. However, Karl Marx who co-wrote the Communist Manifesto distinguished between communism and socialism.
A witness. Mrs. Sai Theetong, age 54 a villager said, she had never seen this man before. When he appeared she was scared because she was alone at home. So she locked her door. A hour later the man was still standing at the same spot. Finally, a municipality officer arrived and took him away.
TV host: The Mufti of Egypt, Dr. Ali Gum’a, said that this is allowed if it makes the couple happy.
In addition to the four-game suspension, the girls on the team will have to undergo diversity training with the National Federation for Just Communities, learning about different cultures and ethnicities.
If so, build a Fleet Beacon immediately (!) and get a Carrier and a Mothership. I would throw in an air attack upgrade as well, since you have the Cybernetics Core. Meanwhile, you’ll have built another 2-3 Void Rays, so your air army will consist of 4-5 Void Rays, a Carrier, and a Mothership. Keep everything in the Mothership’s cloaking field, and try to fight on the edge of a cliff, so that if your opponent sends Hydras, you can just pull back the Mothership and have the Carrier and Void Rays continue decimating the Hydras. Because the air force is very gas-heavy, you’ll probably have a lot of spare minerals, so build a Zealot army that can check expansions.
Summary points
04. Hanky Panky 1:53
Life is really comfortable for Parker…sure there’s no man turning on “Lady Land” but a girl can be happy with a beautiful child and full life.
…PORTIONS OF THE SRN PLAINS…
P.S. If you need a little inspiration to get started, here's one of my all-time favorite Elizabeth Bishop poems (which happens to be a villanelle):
Wouldn't it be a lot easier and much more streamlined if there were still a one stop shop?
The drink is from the stamp of the month February and also the barrel.
Answer: For starters, people throughout history have fretted over proper disposal of baby teeth. Concerns and customs:
Wood Duck Jambalaya
Hi....Busy on this fall day, raking and sweeping, and knowing that since the leaves aren't down yet we will have to do it all over agin..maybe even 2 more times! (if you leave it to do all at once, it is an unbelievable huge job..there are just so many leaves!)
Wouldn't want you to get lost along with way of the garden path. Here is the complete line-up with both teams combined.
I’m getting to the point that it’s too late to do anything. What I do now won’t help me, and I’m already sinking fast.
So...what about you? Do you like your crockpot? Have a favorite crockpot recipe? Do you use those crockpot liners?
Mawlawi’s supporters say he was targeted because of his help for Syrian refugees fleeing to Lebanon.
A little truth is told here. The Quran does prohibit the killing of daughters. However honor killing is permitted, with very little/no penalty to the killer, according to the Islamic laws of must Muslim-majority states.
Other mothers said that if they married, their household income would rise, costing them government benefits like food stamps and child care.
In and of themselves these actions are not particularly new, but the energy with which Polly and Pip pursue them has intensified. The reasons for this intensification are multiple. For one thing, Polly is growing more physically adept every day. She can now jump down from 18-24 inches above the ground and land on her feet. She can slide headfirst off Pip’s bed without hurting herself. She can copy all the noises Pip makes. In all, she can do an increasing number of the things that Pip can do. This means they are playing together more and engaging in a type of mutually reinforcing play that takes Pip’s energetic ideas and ramps them up to levels I wasn’t prepared for. Ava and I have approached this development tentatively; we are thrilled that they are playing together and want to stay out of the way as much as possible but at the same time we’d like them to maintain some semblance of self-control. Figuring out when to stay aloof and when to step in has taken some time and experimentation.
...I spontaneously bought five books:
I wasn't too sure about staying with people that I didn't know well but off I went anyway.
Given that it looked like no one in the entire apartment complex went to work today, there was a great deal of traffic. I don’t know where they were all going but when I got to work the parking garage was unusually empty as well.
Camtrappers lose their cameras to high water, but it doesn't seem to cure them.
I guess it was my fault for not speaking to anyone about the reasons why I was stuck for almost a year. When I started to get a little frustrated for the lack of scale luv, I slowly stopped tracking. I was aware of my food choices and mentally took note, but nothing compares to actually keeping a food journal.
But now .. I would never know, or would I?
891 ***D-XI/30/1984. “The Teacher as Learner: On Discussion.” Paideia Program Teacher Training Conference, Kilmer Grade School, Chicago, Illinois (Incorporated in Item C-1985(4), above, and in Item B-5, above, pp. 591-95 (1992).)
will.i.am says there’s nothing like seeing a crowd respond to his music in real-time. Tonight, he’s taking full advantage of his Ultrabook™ device’s responsiveness to tweak his set as the night goes on, ramping the beats up and down according to the reactions of the audience. He’s even able to hop online to see what’s being posted to the social-verse from the attendees at Club Answer. In Seoul’s digital playground, it’s clear that will.i.am is the maestro and the Ultrabook™ is his primary instrument.
I did it...
Shop, eat, pray? Uh, no. Shop and eat. Shop and eat. We have a new religion, the economy, open 24/7.
Benefits from: Top rate reduction. 4% reduction in corporation tax is bang on trend. Spring budget essentials.
The Game’s basic premise is that Michael Douglas plays a rich billionaire named Nicholas Van Orton who gets a present from his derelict brother, inviting him to participate in a ‘game’ with a strange company called CRS. The film quickly turns into a high speed paranoid thriller in which Orton and a young, mysterious woman named Christine (or is that her real name at all?) embark on a wild ride of conspiracies, betrayals and twists that build up like a rising wave.
The second verse is quoted above -- it's sort of a circa-1972 version of the complaint voiced recently by the "we are the 99 percent" movement.
an-
Here's my little secret to ensuring inverted tucks meet perfectly in the middle, without those unsightly gaps - from the wrong side tack the fold lines together from the raw edge to just below the stitching line, and leave the tacking in until the garment is assembled. Here is mine just before the stitches come out:
I’m still not looking forward to writing the next chapter of my novel. It will be a melancholy, difficult thing to write. I can already feel the anxiety and inner turmoil of my main character. However, I am a writer. It is the profession of my choice (part-time at the moment, granted) and I must do the work even when I don’t feel like it.
Looks like as of about an hour ago...I am going back to school!!! I really am so very excited about it and there are other courses that would really benefit the foundation that I have on my "to take in the near future" list. I never thought I'd be excited to return to school, but I feel empowered when I'm educated about things...especially when it's about something I'm passionate about.
While they baked, I showed her the treats and told her how delicious they would taste. I made a huge deal about the whole event, causing her to wag her tail and softly yip around the kitchen.
Luke 24 continues as thought there is no break between the two chapters. “They” went to the tomb on the first day of the week, “they” being the women referenced in verse 55 of chapter 23. The ones who “saw the tomb and how his body was laid.” When they got there the stone was rolled away, and the body of Jesus was not there. Two apparent angels appeared next to them and asked them, “Why do you seek the living among the dead? He is not here, but has risen.” I tell you, those are some of the sweetest words ever spoken. The angels called upon them to remember the things that Jesus had told them. They went back and told the disciples. The disciples who had been the ones who walked most closely with Jesus for the past few years. Their reaction was that “these words seemed to them an idle tale and they did not believe them.” (v 11) I shouldn’t be too hard on them…I probably would have felt much the same. Or would I have been more like Peter, who “rose and ran to the tomb?” The very same day, he appeared to two nameless disciples (well…I’m sure they had names; we just don’t know them) on the road to Emmaus, who, in turn, went back to the eleven remaining main disciples, reporting their encounter. As they were all talking together, Jesus just appeared in their midst, saying, “Peace to you!”
The Pretty Little Ribbon Shop is an online store offering a wide range of ribbons, twine, rubber stamps and embellishments for all of your crafting needs. This month's new arrivals are gorgeous Large Check Gingham and Polka Dot ribbons in a variety of gorgeous colours. International and small orders are always welcome.
Cubic Zirconia is also not as durable as real diamond. Sure, it can scratch glass and steel and is harder than just about any natural gem. But it’s not as strong as the real deal. This is a major obstacle for Cubic Zirconia’s acceptance; after all, women’s engagement rings undergo so much duress.
To much general rejoicing, Charles Taylor was convicted by the Special Court for Sierra Leone in a long-awaited judgment delivered on 26 April 2012. The delays in issuing the judgment are inexcusable. And we are in fact still waiting for the real judgment. Instead, the judges have given us a
But over the past 30+ years, conservatives have begun to define religious freedom specifically as protecting Christians against the gross infringment of other religions and beliefs upon their precious moral values (too snarky?). While it's true that around 75% of Americans consider themselves Christians, we are still a country of laws, and not a theocracy. Therefore, while we decry Saudi Arabia and other countries around the world who have theocratic regimes, the moral majority, Christian conservative right, still push harder and harder to make Christian moral values the values of our whole country, even going as far as changing laws to comply with Christian morality.
Mr Duncan Smith will add: ‘At the heart of this, it means emphasising the Government’s support for marriage.’
Twenty-one states and the District of Columbia provide some coverage under their own wage laws. Here in the District, as in five of these states, only the minimum wage is required — not the overtime rate.
For my Justin Tranter look I decided to recreate a look that I just happened to stumble upon on the band’s Facebook page, from an event called High Kicks, which takes place weekly at SkyBar in Los Angeles, and where Justin seems to make very regular appearances. These particular images are from February 22, 2012. I just thought the look was unique and gorgeous, and really personified that “Filthy Glamour” concept.
I make obituaries for TV now and then, so when a particularly good one comes along, I take notice. I hope that you will not think me too morbid if I admit to a small collection of my favorites.
Chris Petrella (REP) 0.70% 124
Let us bless the Lord. Alleluia, alleluia.
With police monitoring the "chats", Nelson agreed to meet the men at a house in Long Island.
“Israel thinks it can get away with it because we are too busy with our problems, but this time it is different. Now people are fed up and recognize that Israel is often the aggressor behind our mess. What really concerns us now is that other crises may surface, such as a war with Iran, or another scandal bigger than the Mohammed cartoon, just to shift the attention away from the Gaza Siege,” said R. Shahman, an activist with MuslimBridges.org.
Just long enough for her to tell me about Riversingers by Tom Moorhouse. "It's about water violes," Catherine told me. "A sort of Wind in the Willows for the 21st century."
The steal of deal,
For these projects, I got to use the Bouquet Patches Collection.
xo Faythe Levine
You’ll need to remove the initial outer layer of the garlic “shell” and then chop off the very top of the head so that the garlic inside is exposed.
I’m writing this article to bring a personal perspective to SUDEP and to urge everyone affected by epilepsy, whether you yourself have the condition or a family member has it, to find out more about SUDEP and understand the risk factors involved. A risk factor is a characteristic that increases the chance that SUDEP will occur. It is important to know what yours are so you can take the necessary actions to safeguard your, or your loved one’s, life.
Mercy defeated fellow
Sweet Sketch Wednesday.
you would turn sad,
The alternate use:
* Foods of a particular (French) flavor
Me: What? We don't have a new kitty.
It all began with a series of articles of a well-known science magazine, or which Aloysius is an ardent reader. Dropping into his library one day, I found him sitting cross-legged upon the floor, with several copies of the magazine strewn around him. As I entered, he glanced up, made a dive for one of the magazines, and thrust it at me.
Her character, Gabe, too, is a straddler. Working in the metropolitan heart of London, he is nevertheless aware of the racism that runs like dark blood through Blantwistle, his hometown in north England.
As you begin your journey to a more minimalist lifestyle you will feel the weight being lifted from your shoulders. It just feels food.
Purpose
All three axles will be perpendicular to the motor and wheel axles. Energy between them will be transferred by miter gears (motor to input, and output to wheel).
Coriander - 1 tsp
flash points across the state as
It recently released the Genesee Heritage Collection, a limited-edition pack featuring Genesee Beer, Genesee Cream Ale and 12 Horse Ale. The latter is the brewery’s most requested legacy beer. It was first brewed in 1933 after the repeal of Prohibition. It has not been brewed for years.
Fritz Wepper was born in Munich, Germany in 1941. His father was the jurist Friedrich Karl Wepper, who is missing since early 1945 in Poland. As a 9-year old boy, Fritz played in children’s TV programs at the Bayerische Rundfunk (Bavarian TV). In 1952 he made his stage debut in Peter Pan. He made his film debut with a small supporting part in Sauerbruch – Das war mein Leben/The Life of Surgeon Sauerbruch (1954, Rolf Hansen), starring Ewald Balser. More small roles followed in the drama Der dunkle Stern/The Dark Star (1955, Hermann Kugelstadt), the Grimm Brothers’ fairytale Tischlein deck dich/Table, Donkey and Stick (1956, Jürgen von Alten) and the comedy Eine verrückte Familie/A crazy family (1957, Harald Philipp) starring Paul Dahlke and Hans Moser. Wepper also appeared in the Heinz Rühmann comedy Der Pauker/The Crammer (1958, Axel von Ambesser) and then had his breakthrough in the anti-war film Die Brücke/The Bridge (1959, Bernhard Wicki). Dan Pavlides at AllMovie: “this is an excellent little film with little plot and no known names on the roster. In the final days of World War II, German teenagers join the Nazi army in a futile attempt to stop the enemy invasion. A sympathetic officer places the boys as guards of a seemingly unimportant bridge. The seven youths are thrown into battle when American tanks unexpectedly appear and try to cross the bridge. The film has a definite anti-war message.” From then on he also played on stage, such as at the Kleinen Komödie in Munich. In the cinema he was seen in such films as Question 7 (1961, Stuart Rosenberg), the Walt Disney production Miracle of the White Stallions (1962, Arthur Hiller), and on television in the Shakespeare adaptation Was Ihr wollt/As You Like It (1962, Franz Peter Wirth) with Ingrid Andree, and Sonderurlaub/Special leave (1963, Rainer Erler). In 1964, the then 23-year old Wepper won the Filmband in Gold as Best Young Actor for his role in the war drama Kennwort: Reiher/The River Line (1964, Rudolf Jugert) starring Peter van Eyck and Marie Versini.
F: my desire for you awakens an ache in the heart,
The role of a teacher is an ever changing one. With each generation a new challenge presents itself that has to be addressed in the classroom and is left to the teacher and schools to ensure that students are prepared to face what the world is like. A classroom is the extension of the outside world. Yet it has to be more than that. It has to be an environment where in the purest way students learn to be good and to do good. This is where students “catch” values. My role as the teacher will be one where I model good values to my students, where I create an environment where my students thrive not only intellectually but as human beings, members of a society. My students will gather values and morals through the experiences in the classroom. My students will be exposed to honesty, kindness, humility, justice, and compassion. By exposing my students to enriching experiences my goal will be to naturally guide them towards values and morals that will enrich their lives and those around them thus making a stronger society. Kirk points out that virtue can be taught “why, it can be learnt, though more through a kind of illative process than as a formal program of study.” In the end my students won’t be formally quizzed on the values they acquire in my classroom but eventually they will be tested when they venture out in the world and make their individual marks.
5 returned
“Today’s federal government is considerably at odds with that envisioned by the framers of the Constitution. Thomas J. DiLorenzo gives an account of how this came about in The Real Lincoln.” —Walter E. Williams, from the foreword
Anyway after what had happened i just tried to forget it but it didnt help me that he was still trying to get intouch with my through the internet, telephone and even while we were out with my fiance.
Young mothers and fathers, with all my heart I counsel you not to postpone having your children, being co-creators with our Father in heaven.
The resolution is meant to prevent criticism of Islam. Originally it tried to prohibit “defamation,” but of course that’s no crime in the U.S. So the language changed: it’s now illegal to criticize faith in a way that incites violence. (That’s a form of free speech that, under some circumstances, is also prohibited in America).
I was meeting Atul and all my friends after a long gap of 2-3 years. I thought Atul will react the same way as he did during the college days but the reaction was quiet different where he smiled, asking me to take a seat and engaged in talks with other people. I was feeling bored and there was nothing to engage in. Mayank engaged me in thoughts avoiding most of his priorities so I feel comfortable. Mayank has been a good friend to me and Atul and was with us from Schools.
Last night as I was trying to fall asleep, for some reason, my mind strayed back forty-some years to the mid-60s when young wives were striving to achieve elegant living. I don’t remember Julia doing a show on fancy butter, but after my European trip in 1965 when I first saw butter curls with croissants in Paris, pretty butter became a goal. In following years, I purchased a variety of implements to make butter curls, balls, etc. and significant time before a dinner party would be spent shaping butter, although I don’t remember anyone – with the possible exception of my mother-in-law – commenting on the beautiful butter. I can remember 5 different butter tools – one hooked (as can be seen in the picture below), one something like a cheese plane, one two-part silver dish that squished out the butter in “petals,” butter paddles (as also seen below), and a piping bag with large star tip to create rosettes. All of that seems pretty silly in the world of 2011, but it was part of the transition to realizing that every aspect of a meal could be beautiful.
Sci-fi/fantasy writers are some of the worst offenders. It is easy to fall in love with our world-building and forget we need a plot with players. Keep the priorities straight. In twenty years people won’t remember gizmos, they will remember people.
run/walk 12+ miles
Regularly performing live in Paris' Barbesse district — an area made up primarily of African immigrants — Ice's driving funk became increasingly influenced by African rhythms and textures, and in the wake of their
After we are briefed on man's domineering spirit, we are treated to a pair of montages which convey his destructive tendencies in ways both eruptive and corrosive. The first sequence is comprised of archival footage of warfare, a barrage of explosions in the sky and on the ground. This is followed by a tour of the doomed Pruitt-Igoe projects in St. Louis, a barren expanse of concrete and detritus which was laid to waste in a series of controlled demolitions. The ideological failure represented by the ruination of Pruitt-Igoe embodies numerous themes of the film: the societal decay reflected in urban sprawl; the human misery wrought by poverty and overpopulation; the myopic folly of our faith in technology. The footage of the projects' day of reckoning initiates the second montage in this cycle, during which we are treated to the demise of a variety of structures, including high rise buildings and support bridges. This battery of implosions and explosions achieves a level of bombast which borders on the absurd, undercutting the gravity of the situation even as it hammers the viewer into submission.
There Menma is looking at Jintan by the road, too. She’s really impressed at the sight.
Discover What I Want To Do
To date, the NYPD has declined to investigate this incident and has ruled there was no crime committed. Council Member Letitia James believes that the NYPD mishandled the initial investigation by ruling that there was no criminality even though witnesses say the vehicle that hit Mrs. McKay-Dalton was speeding and had run a red light.
On top are some family photos, a battery operated candle on a cream pedestal (doubles as a nightlight), and a vintage silverplate pitcher that's all tarnished for some interest with some real-looking but fake seasonal branches.
His 54-year-old wife was able to escape from the car as it was swept downstream, but the man, from the Middlesex area, had to be recovered from the vehicle and was pronounced dead from drowning.
“I can’t remember much after I got to the Court, but I know I was in no fit shape to handle a Sherim.” She pushed herself to her feet and put a hand on his shoulder, “Besides, I think I know where we are.”
1 package chili seasoning
Brett Butler as Shelly
to be the connecting link between the physical and spiritual worlds.
“I think so,” I replied.
Received a VeryNiceAward
Christoph Mueller, Aer Lingus’ chief executive, added that the increased profits had been achieved “against a difficult backdrop of non-controllable fuel price inflation, increased airport charges and challenging demand conditions in our primary markets”.
b. Rom 8:5 For they that are after the flesh do mind the things of the flesh; but they that are after the Spirit the things of the Spirit. Rom 8:6 For to be carnally minded is death; but to be spiritually minded is life and peace. Rom 8:7 Because the carnal mind is enmity against God: for it is not subject to the law of God, neither indeed can be. Rom 8:8 So then they that are in the flesh cannot please God. Rom 8:9 But ye are not in the flesh, but in the Spirit, if so be that the Spirit of God dwell in you. Now if any man have not the Spirit of Christ, he is none of his.
The kinds of anomalies that some people go hunting for don’t hint at improvements to good scientific theories, but consist simply of any result which stands out in some way. Anything that looks a bit weird can be seen as an “anomaly” – even though weirdness is often a fundamental and entirely expected feature of the universe. Not every theory should be expected to immediately explain every observation. To suggest that a theory needs to be entirely thrown out, and replaced with some entirely new paradigm, is a common overreaction to one small “anomaly” being found.
Derek Strange rejects that advice. His hard-working, God-fearing parents raised him right. Unlike some of the kids he went to high school with, he never succumbed to the attractions of drink, drugs, and crime. As What It Was demonstrates, he is far from perfect, but he at least tries to do the right thing.
Last year it was 3 Japanese Girls in Bikini's playing trombones.
wrapped in faulty meters,
Since we call her "B" for short, I thought having a bumble-"B" party would be the perfect celebration. Instead of using the traditional colors of black and yellow that we associate with bees, I incorporated all of the party details using a lighter, softer color palette of whites, yellows, grays, pastel pinks and pastel teals. I must thank all of my amazing vendors that helped make the party such a success (see all listed below), and in particular, I want to give a shout-out to my talented and hard-working sister. She is the owner of Unink Design LLC (www.facebook.com/uninkdesignllc), and really made the ideas in my head come to life!
Why on earth would you ask them if they are asleep..... Dumb question.
I live mostly in the 'now'. I don't like looking back at my previous work. Every book is special when I am working on it.
TIMES
Lastly, when Winter’s Bone receives some Oscar nominations don’t forget the five-year journey that it took for the filmmakers to get to that point.
I asked God why did He bring this dream opportunity across my screen without seeing it through!?
The Chicago-born actor and two-time Tony nominee died at 73. At 6' 7" and possessing a coolly-slung baritone, Williams played judges, district attorneys, radicals, preachers, cops, criminals, doctors, federal agents throughout a 40 year film career. He was in Dog Day Afternoon, Edward Sissorhands and Mo Better Blues.
So what is the deal with me here? Is it so terrible that I can't just run off for a carefee weekend of reckless abandon now? Because like.... I don't think I've ever run off for a weekend of carefree abandon in my life. Getting a dog just kind of seals the deal, I guess. It's official.
I got into the spirit of the evening with my most 40's-esque outfit, hat and all, and I ended up feeling quite at home amongst the glamourous models, and Chitra herself, who was decked out on the most adorable ensemble from the top of her yellow hat and polkadot cravat, to the edwardian style ankle boots.
A man who lives in the area explained what appears to have happened next.
Tori was very specific about everything.
even by just a quarter-hour
Please excuse my rambling.
(* I adore this cover! I was given a special edition one, designed by Giles Deacon (I'd never heard of him, but he's a top fashion designer (I know next to zilch about the fashion industry), which really does fit in with the design element of the book, but I like the original best. It's bright and snazzy and more my style.)
I have always been thankful to have a mother-in-law that has always let me be who I am, and do things my own way. I imagine, now that I have a son, how hard it must be to let go of your boy and watch as they ease into a life without you.
That’s right, “Titanic II” will be a 21st-century, historically accurate replica of the original Titanic and is set to make its maiden voyage from England to New York in 2016.
3pm: Late lunch, rest
Frenzal Rhomb
Men come inside me,
3. I read recently in "The 24" that St. Paul's Hospital in Vancouver plans to open a 24-hour drop-off room where women can abandon their newborn children anonymously. My initial reaction to reading this was shock - general shock, about the whole topic. I'm not an ostrich with my head in the sand, I know that things like mothers abandoning their babies happen - it just caught me off guard reading about such a...what's the word I'm searching for...blunt (?!maybe?!) solution. I went on to read that 'Safe Haven' policies exist in all US states as well as several other countries, like Britain and Japan. Now, having read that, it surprises me that Canada has not yet got anything like this in place; however, the anonymity of the St. Paul's service will be a first in North America. The article says that hospital officials do not think this service will be used very frequently, and that they hope that it won't be used at all. Wow. This really gets me thinking about a lot of things. Makes me want to hug my children. Makes me want to hug the next teenage mom I see (not to imply that it's only and always teenagers who go this route), and makes me very, very thankful that I have been lucky enough to be able to conceive and carry three pregnancies to term and have them result in three healthy children. Never mind the piles of laundry, the messy floors, the daunting utilities bills, the petty annoyances/grievances with your neighbours or your co-workers or your spouse, etc. - gotta find a reason to stop each day and be thankful. "There but for the grace of God go I".
Instead of the cloying shredded fluff called for in most recipes, here you use coconut flakes – unsweetened! – then heat them over a double boiler mixed with classic egg whites, a touch of sugar, and a few drops of vanilla. They take a siesta for half an hour, the better to absorb the slowly hydrating egg. A heap of lime zest rounds out the dough, which is piled into attractive little spike-bundles and dusted with cinnamon, then briefly singed at high heat followed by coalescing under lower intensity.
Today I signed up for e-mail alerts when items are close to being overdue. That's a lifesaver, why wasn't I signed up for that earlier? I also wrote on the calendar the date the books are due back. Now I just need to remember to check my calendar! So there is a price for being disorganized, I just paid mine. What's yours?
With my card today, my sentiment is on the inside, so that is what the second picture is of, and there is a mini tissue and tissue holder there. Saw it some where and thought it was a good idea for a Get Well card.
Truth be told I will also miss the physical thing, the CD and the booklet. It is not at the level, due to the size, of what you used to get with vinyl, but still it added something in a lot of cases. It is not the same viewing it as PDF files on the screen. Still that will be a slight annoyance, but my main issue is with the quality. This might be making me sound old, after all old muso types complained about vinyl being on the way out, but I’ve no gripes with the idea itself, the convenience sure is useful. I just hope the CD will be around long enough for digital formats (with appropriate storage technologies) to catch up in sound quality. As it stands now, that is why I’m not looking forward to the death of the CD.
It’s entirely possible that I’m jumping the gun about not having anyone do a goodbye thing for me, but I’d be willing to bet good money on the fact that, other than the stylists telling their customers that it’s my last day, I’ll leave with no fanfare.
I am not sure whether or not I like the Guildhall building. On one hand it has a pleasant round shape and is certainly large and imposing, but on the other, it somehow looks inflated as though it’s about to burst its breeches. The foundation stone was laid in 1934 and the complex serves both Kingston Council and the Magistrates Court. It took over its role in 1935 from the old Guildhall, now called the Market House. In the courtyard lies a feature which is another source of pride to Kingston – you can just see it at bottom right in the above photo.
said.
Vineyards could also sell to a retailer, such as a licensed liquor store, or to a wholesaler. The winery also would be permitted to ship up to 12 cases to any customer for personal consumption.
So I thought tonight is the night. The night this club goes upside down. I thought these three girls go in and smash the DJ’s turntable and kick his ass. Songs he plays are the worst. These songs degenerate women like bad cheese. So I was look forward to seeing some drama.
she follows all four of us everywhere
I love the shape of the dress! I think that it's very flattering on most girls I've seen wearing it.
Grown Ups is definitely a family movie. And it is a movie that the family will enjoy. It's well paced, so it doesn't drag. It will entertain you, no matter how old you are. And you will laugh, but maybe not as much as you expected.
Just a little sketch from the world of the real life non-internet based people!
Q: How many Sharon Cunetas does it take to change a light bulb?
So my next 5 musings shall be recollections/experiences of the best times I have had …my fondest memories where there was maximum learning, fun and plenty of explorations too !
Senses bringing delights that satisfy and are ... enough.
Option 1: Our favourite look right now is the Retrospect Console Table from American Standard. It would definitely meet our aesthetic and space requirements, and would match multiple wall cabinet options, but it needs to be custom ordered and is a little bit outside our budget ($700ish, plus the matching toilet is pricey).
There has been no time for friends or family. There has been no free time. For four years, it’s all been about school.
Many Western countries are now trying to support Myanmar’s democratic reforms by improving their ties with the country.
For those of you who are not Aussie, it is Footy Grand Finals Time this weekend! By saying "Footy" I do not mean Soccer, I am referring to Aussie Rules and Rugby League! and this time every year we are inundated with "footy", flashbacks, awards nights, final fever and many many BBQ's will be held this weekend across Australia to watch these games. So in the spirit of "Footy" this weeks challenge at The Squirrel & The Fox is "Make it Sporty".
Dear Blogger:
Park Street again. Steepness makes my chest burn. Straining cyclists overtake me and I watch the muscles of their calves clench and release and clench and release. When I am nobody I do not ride a bicycle so the bicycle of all the other girls I have been is locked away in Jack’s garage with other secret things. I do not go in there. Do not ask what is hidden inside in case he tells me. Do not look at his face.
What is it with these Labour councillors? Many of them do appear to be genuinely nasty people. Baroness Thatcher may not be everyone’s cup of tea but what a truly horrible thing wish upon her. Tameside Citizen
(d) The gluten stiffens into the distended shape.
Christopher A. Warren, Purdue University, Indiana, USA: The Effect of Post-Racial Theory on Education
Marjoe
the beauty of this cake is that not only is it yeast free but its dairy free too... sure there is a bucket of eggs in there but its so light and moist it tastes so divine... the recipe draws its heritage from a Nigella recipe found in Feast and also her classic Clementine Cake but it's also very similar to one of my mum's passover cakes... it's more than possible they both got it from the same old jewish lady...
I was about to give up, but luckily my friend is a professional photographer who uses Canon products and she said their service people were excellent. This morning I called to talk to a lovely man who walked me through the steps to get my camera working again. It still might need to get looked at but as for now IT IS WORKING! No $300 spent, just a little toggle of a few buttons and a reset of the autofocus and I'm back in business. Then I asked him, out of curiosity, how to get the 20D working with my computer, and again, it was a simple task of changing something in the menu. Viola! Both cameras working, no money spent, a fifteen minute phone call.
What is “minimalism”?
How hard and long would you be willing to work to obey God?
Or is it just a grasshopper, shy,
We celebrated my wonderful husband Grant's birthday this week, and of course I wanted to make him a special cake. There were three things I wanted this cake to be: 1) light, 2) bright and happy, and 3) it would have a special surprise inside! Like this:
Cock-A-Doodle-Do! Rooster editor Paul Jutras is a finalist in the National Campaign Category for his editorial work on Red Urban’s Volkswagen – Drive Until campaign directed by Untitled Film’s Jean-Michel Ravon.
As much as I loved looking at the pearls, I just didn't get around to using them. On some nights, I would think of simmering them in coconut milk, but never got around to it. Many evenings, I would just stare at the bag, wondering why they didn't make tapioca pearls I could just pop into my mouth. I mean those colors! Really! How much of a torture is it to have all those cute little pearls and not be able to dig into the bag and munch on a handful?
After the calculation, in each day’s menu, we need to eat 4 meals (not 3!). However we were allowed to eat in any order for these four menus as long as we must eat 4 times a day! Even good, within each menu, we could choose to eat any suggested food and in any portion but we had to stop eating when we started to feeling full. This sounded simple enough for us to follow and we found it fun to eat in such way.
My good friend just had a baby and I wanted to make her something cute.
Did it matter? Nope, because next turn my mounted troops from the right flank swarmed over a Royalist hanger on was dispatched and the Royalist right wing command was now demoralised and broken (see below):
Next week — Monday, May 7th — will be the first test. An application for an 18-storey residential condominium development for 148-150 Macdonell is coming to Council for a decision. Here is what it looks like (images from City of Guelph development file):
Sometimes life is hard yakka and in a marriage there is always someone else to consider.
Plaques and tangles, along with CVA and diffuse cell loss, are hallmarks of Alzheimer’s disease, and are easily observed in AD brain tissue. But they don’t even begin to tell the whole story. There are many other changes that occur in the AD brain and cause it to lose function. More on those next time.
and you may have noticed my choices often move from classic to english rose to modern.
cowed by the pressures of morality’s herd.
It was cute. Got a little hokey at times. But overall, I enjoyed it. Sizemore was hilarious, Woodard and Sedgwick had a lot of heart. I really liked how Downey portrayed having his body being taken over. I think it was a fun find and I’m glad one of my friends started capping it on tumblr.
The question then is this: do I embrace that I am off, that I will never have straight pictures, scratch-free legs, and correctly folded fitted sheets? Do I acknowledge that things will always be slightly crooked and smudged? Or do I try to straighten myself out somehow? Is there some way to do that, like a metaphorical V8 that will shift me to line up with the world?
10. Do any foods bring back good memories?
Not Your Mother's-All Eyes On Me Shape & Shine Hairspray does the job incredibly well. This is my go to hairspray. It is easy to use, lightweight, gentle, and smells delightful unlike other hairsprays out there.
Saturday began with the West Side Market and then to the Hall of Fame. We were informed it would take 5 to 6 hours to tour this museum, so really this was all that was planned. However…
Rating: 1/5 Great idea, poor follow through.
I can recall how oddly content I felt on that sunny winter's day as I stood on parade smartly dressed in my dark blue winter uniform, clutching my new companion with tender pride. I was sure that my squeaky-clean 7,62mm R1 rifle must have looked rather menacing that day, as its shiny-black barrel sparkled in the winter sun.
Wow, who would've thought that the 80's soft rock balladeer would have an inner barbarian? Mmm, probably not. Yes, I realize that the chances of the author and the crooner being the same person are nil, but maybe we should all "Don't Stop Cleaving."
It's Chris Christie (talking about the Scott Walker recall):
Here's how it ties in with her crib :
News broke in the US last night EST of what may turn out to be the biggest ‘exposure’ of consumer personal details in retail history. A broad spectrum of companies doing business with Epsilon warned customers over the weekend that some of their electronic information could have been exposed. These included pharmacy chain Walgreen, Video recorder TiVo Inc, credit card lender Capital One Financial Corp, and teleshopping company HSN Inc. Other targets are also thought to include some of the nation’s largest banks, while some 5,900 college databanks were also compromised.
AWP: Why these 3 women — such different women — why did you decide to write about them together?
Our Tupperware Eco Water Bottles allow you to carry water, your own filtered or tap water, without contributing to the tragedy of the millions of plastic bottles that now into our landfills and oceans! They come in 3 sizes, and if you purchase a dozen of them, spend a little time to fill one or two up ans you leave home, you could save $100's a year if you purchase by the case!
What do we have aboard, and why? Let's start with the big guns, the Digital SLRs or DSLRs.
when the frogs start croakin'?
I don't need to measure it's calorie value because there is nothing I want to compare it against. There is no better or worse way of eating that I aspire to. It's just another day.
I suppose I won’t really know whether a young reader embraces We’ve Got a Job with her or his heart until I hear from one. The closest I’ve come to date is a message from a young teacher who taught the book, in galley form, last fall to her high school students. The teacher wrote to me, “I think I’ve finally internalized the notion that when you have a vision and a message, it is important to spread it as widely as you can because every contribution helps us all, collectively, be better: better at what we do, and if we’re lucky, be better people.”
Those who turn away from you will be written in the dust
This week: Looking forward to being back in Cleveland and participating in the Cleveland 10 miler this Saturday morning. B, his sister and I plan on using it as part of our TWENTY MILE training run.
It leaves me to keep going. You don’t stay down with the first hurdle, or any of them. First week went like I hoped, second week less so.
I am the stone which rules the edge
So what’s the point of my trip down memory lane? Maybe I don’t have one. Or maybe I’m just reminding myself that the heat of debate usually has very little to do with the light of truth. I think that’s a good thing to reminder every now and again.
Poe’s novel closely mirrored the most credible explanation of Mary Rogers’ death, which was put forth by author Raymond Paul in the early 1970s. Paul’s theory was that Daniel Payne murdered Rogers, but not on the Sunday she disappeared, for which Payne had a solid alibi, but on the following Tuesday. Because Mary’s body was still in rigor mortis when she was found, she could not have been dead for more than 24 hours. Rigor mortis starts scant hours after a person dies, but then after 24 hours, it gradually dissipates.
Picture this… Me, giddy, on the treadmill, my head tilted to one side because of the onesided headache, curls flying everwhere and round red face!
On Tuesday, officials at the Horace Mann School in Cherry Hill, New Jersey, directed calls from Yahoo! Shine to the Cherry Hill School District’s offices; a call to a spokesperson there was not immediately returned. Cherry Hill Public School District spokesperson Susan Bastnagel told the Collingswood Patch on Tuesday only that the incident is “an internal personnel matter that the district took seriously and handled appropriately.”
I will be attending the one for which I received an invitation first, and it is conveniently Hogwarts themed! I already knew I was going to make a gown for King Richard's Faire this year and decided to combine the two costumes and go to the party as Rowena Ravenclaw.
A trick that Myst once used to perform for Matt and me, he is now doing for our son. Ryan made the discovery using Myst's toy mouse. He's been obsessed with us playing "catch" with him using his football, so he decided to try Myst's catching skills.
When we arrived to our camp site, we were informed we would be on Tornado alert until 4am in the morning. Because of this our leader got us cabins. A very nice change to tents! We were also instructed that if we heard sirens to get to the shower block for cover.
‘We've created approaches that open a previously untapped portion of the electromagnetic spectrum for consumer use and life-saving medical applications,’ said Dr. Kenneth O, professor of electrical engineering at UT Dallas.
Can I just say that I got SPOILED from her!!!
Perched atop one of the highest points on the island, the luxurious main house is move-in ready and enjoys 360-degree views and top-of-the-line appointments. Plans for 38 buildings totaling 70,000 sq. ft. include a 3-story houseboat with a marina shop on the first level and a 2-story residence overhead, plus staff and maintenance buildings. A large clubhouse and restaurant, shower and bathroom facilities, and three guest houses with hotel rooms and suites are still under construction.
Emilio
We need to wake up and smell the roses and stop feeding the machine.
Instead, they’re like …
all over again
I had hopes that it would get better. People keep telling me that crying peaks between 6-8 weeks and then decreases. Well, Brigham will be 8 weeks this Sunday and I see (and hear) no end in sight.
you texts and emails, and doing other affectionate and meaningful things to get to know
“Thank you so much. I’m sorry you had to do that.” I say, considering shaking his hand and then thinking better of it.
I almost always like IPA's and I think if I were to drink it again, I might like it more. I had a few beers at lunch with dad and I think that kind of hurt the palette for this beer (I had a Sierra Nevada, a Bell's Two hearted and then when we got home from the shower I had a Great Lakes Eliot Ness...)
OK, ' she said. 'That could be an interesting topic. But let me ask you a question first. A horse, a cow, and a deer all eat the same stuff - grass. Yet a deer excretes little pellets, while a cow turns out a flat patty, and a horse produces clumps of dried grass. Why do you suppose that is?'
“….were we intent on improperly feeding the media frenzy, we could now release substantial information that in our view would seriously undermine the quality of this prosecution, and also gravely undermine the credibility of the complainant in this case…..”.
#7 Eat Apples
The Turks had been sighted several days ago, marching from Palestine toward the canal. Among colonial and military circles, everyone was anxious about the offensive's outcome and yet so certain of victory. Aside from echoes of a world at war and the maddening dust, another malaise afflicted the old city. With the British military occupying Egypt, foreigners and infidels in the eyes of the native Egyptians, there was a yearning for independence and mixed feelings about opposing the Ottoman Empire.
“My kid is healthy. My kid ‘s the happiest baby ever. He did n’t have teeth and he would choke,” she explained.” And, basically, how it started was simply that Bear — when he was about 5 months old — I’d be eating and he would come at me with his little mouth open and be on my mouth trying to get the food out of my mouth”.
18. Favorite junk food:
shoot that took place at Shawn “Jay-Z” Carter’s newly renovated 40/40 Club New York. (6 W. 25th
Long in short is, that I wanted to do something surreal.
As Jon phrased it, how many other grandmothers were at the tryouts we went to? Well, none.
This Monday just gone, J was trying to convince me to get off the couch and get out of the house! Enjoy the last of the wonderful Summer days that we're going to get.
SH maintains that it is a nice-looking lamp and I suppose that on its own, it is. It just doesn't match, not that I am all matchy matchy, but I do like a unifying theme and that theme usually isn't, "Actually functions and will keep me from going blind or getting a headache."
Cause there’s nothing more beautiful at all
Roll over and fry the other side similarly.
Well...backtracking to March...Kendall, my mom, and I went down to San Diego for Girls Weekend and Jenny's baby shower. Her friend Laura threw a tea party themed shower and it was fun!
After reading the instructions I thought I could add a bit of detail, so here's my step-by-step with photos of my first bow crafting session.
He will not abandon His heritage. . . (I really am NOT alone)
Through his investigation, Joseph befriends a 16 year old who calls herself Dizzy Lizzy, a young runaway who sells herself in order to provide for the social misfits that inhabit her world. Amid accusations that he is losing his objectivity, he becomes a pariah amongst his fellow officers. Lizzy becomes suspect on the street for her cooperation with the enemy.
I overslept and while I rushed around to get my middle kids to school, my oldest two sulked because I kept them home from school, making them miss all the fun activities going on today. I'm just mean that way. Austin made the little ones breakfast. On the menu was popcorn and chocolate milk. Then he transformed the family room into a movie theater by hanging blankets from all the windows to really darken the room. He dragged out every bean bag chair and pillow in the house for the little ones and gave them bowls of their "breakfast" to eat while watching the movie. Sometime during the movie, they spilled popcorn all over the place. It's probably because about 20 minutes into the film, they lost interest and started jumping around the place like baboons. Upon seeing the spilled popcorn, I gave Austin a look that told him he'd better clean it up before I started raving like a psycho.
Heat the olive oil in a large frying pan or saute` pan, Sprinkle the chickens with salt and pepper and place them skin-side-down in the hot oil. Brown well. You should be able to lift the chicken off the bottom off the pan easily when it's ready. Flip and brown the other side lightly.
I'm excited that so many are enjoying the characters in my novel, By the Light of the Silvery Moon. Want to know more about the REAL people on the Titanic? My friend Sharyn has been kind enough to write some profiles for us. They are amazing and interesting...enjoy!
We thought we had plenty of time but of course we were walking into the show as it was starting. Our seats were great and all of the kids seemed to really enjoy it - of course they sat together except for Trevor who sat on my lap for the 1st 30-45 min with NO snacks which was a miracle.
It seems that allergies are on everyone's minds! It doesn't help that Spring already happens to be one of the busiest seasons for moms, with everything from holidays to homework on our plates. Luckily, we're all in it together and sometimes just commiserating with another mom is the encouragement we need to power through- that and the relief that Children's Claritin provides our little ones! Another thing that we all rely on the get us through our craziest days is a good laugh. If you need one today, make sure to check out the new Claritin short film, "The Difference is Clear" starring Brooke Burke-Charvet, host of Dancing with the Stars and co-CEO of ModernMom.com. If you haven't seen it yet, it's a crazy, over-the-top look at two versions of one busy woman's day who is juggling work, life and family, while also dealing with allergies. If anyone can relate to this video, it's all of us in the Children's Claritin Mom Crew! Enjoy it and stay tuned for behind-the scenes footage to be posted in early April.
Clary saw by the narrowing of the Queen’s eyes that she had gambled hard — maybe too hard — on the faerie woman’s pride; but a moment later, the Queen was smiling, and the creatures in the walls shrieked appreciatively. “Tricky like your father,” she said, and Clary felt it like a kick in the stomach. “Very well. What would you like of me in return for the ___? I shall decide if your proposal merits a negotiation.”
Making a shaped card with Spellbinders Grand die templates is super quick and easy. Simply fold your cardstock in half, position the fold on the cut side of the die template so that one edge slightly overlaps the cut and run it through your Grand Calibur die cutting machine - voila! Next comes a shaped frame (you are going to love this): Nest two of your die templates in each other and secure with a little tape - that's so they don't shift around and give you a wonky frame - run through the machine and you have an instant effortless frame! See how fun this is...okay now you are ready to stamp: If you plan to color your images with Copic markers use Memento ink because the ink won't run or bleed. Stamp your images twice - once on patterned paper and once on white cardstock. Color your images on the white cardstock and neatly trim the outline. Position your Label die template over the stamped images on the patterned paper and run it through the die cutting machine. Now that you have all your elements you are ready to embellish, adhere and be satisfied you are 1 card down 50 to go :)
Later that day, when Fuckle gets back to his house, he heads straight for the kitchen. He starts rummaging around in there, getting out all the big knives he can find.
Let me start off by saying, a mere 5 months ago, a trip to our new mailbox meant bundling up and running out to it as fast as I could so that I could get back in the house, and out of the cold.
America is littered with hidden hate crimes which are not acknowledged as such because the law is not intended to protect white people.
The document is littered with underlying assumptions (smoking/climate change/obesity is a problem which needs to be tackled) which are cues for those with an eye to advancement to pick up on. No magic involved there, ambitious workers of the system will know what is expected.
— There is no time limit in achieving the objective but the attacker has a limited amount of tickets. When his ticket capital reaches 0, he loses the whole round. Ticket means respawn. Each time an attacker dies, the ticket count is decreased. If he is revived, the ticket count is increased again.
5. son gets indicted for stealing money then we think maybe his accountants did not prepare the books right
Radiohead No surprises UK
Some years ago, I found this poem in a book in a library, I was not a member of that library, I could not borrow the book, but I wanted to share that poem, so I clicked a furtive photograph. Alas, I forgot to write the name of the poet...
The element of the uncanny reminded me of the Viktor and Rolf retrospective exhibition at the at the Barbican Gallery in London in 2008 in which porcelain dolls of various sizes were used to present the designer duo’s fifteen years of work. The installation played with scale and was somewhat like a trip to Alice in Wonderland, which was exactly the intent of the exhibition designers (Evans 6).
"As with the LDS church, the book centers on the Golden Plates that church founder Joseph Smith said the angel Moroni gave him in 1830,"
You can see our fist assignment draw a town in which you will base your story for fiction class. I’m excited I love writing stories just never finish them so now I can learn how. Eeek.
A – Para 7.20 states that – “…there is no single system of procurement which should be preferred in all circumstances…”
Over the past ten years, I have gained professional experience through many different companies. My professional skills came at a young age when I acquired a paper route. With that job I learned the importance of getting the job done right the first time, and the importance of punctuality.
For the base and base layer I used the Grand Label 4. I inked around the edges of the base layer using Tim Holtz distressed in-victorian velvet. I then layered a fun piece of burlap down and then layered a scalloped circle and frame that I cut at 2 3/4 from the Live Simply cartridge. I inked around the edges of that also and pop dotted for dimension.
Nook Ebook on Barnes and Noble
That may be about to change...
I was silent a while, sensing a mild rebuke.
‘It is also a lot of risk taking and adventure that we will never really know the consequences of our action upon ourselves.
This wouldn't be the first time that Raytheon had positioned itself, and profited from, a media-driven panic. As investigative journalist Tim Shorrock documented for CorpWatch, "as the primary spying unit of defense industry giant Raytheon," the firm's Intelligence and Information Services division (Raytheon IIS) is the premier provider of command and control systems "capable of transforming data into actionable intelligence."
This recipe allows for substitutions in types and quantities. Maybe you might want to add some beets, turnips or rutabagas instead of, or in addition to those used in this recipe. Just adjust the dressing quantity and cooking time accordingly.
Enriched Feelings may seem Hollow
For OSU, this period has been the last few years of Poke Basketball. Eddie Sutton's descent into alcoholism, prescription abuse, and scowling disorder, has been a difficult time for Cowboy fans. Indeed, the problem became so great that Eddie had to resign from his head coaching post and pursue other activities (Campaigning for a Strom Thurmond National Memorial? Drinking as much 3% Beer as the human body will allow? Gambling in OK's many Indian Casinos? Okie Noodling? A BearMeat Editor could speculate on such things for days). Regardless, Sutton's exit was hardly the triumphant farewell of Ronald Reagan, or the graceful fade away of Marlon Brando, but it was full of sound and fury, signifying nothing. Such disgrace is unbecoming of so noble a school; an unbearable truth, yet it must be endured.
Unable to cope with the new rules of the game -- violence, mob riots, intimidation through accusations of racism, demands for proportionality based on racial numbers, and all the other social and political weapons used by the have-nots to bludgeon treasure and power from the haves -- Americans, like others before them, will no doubt cave in. They will compromise away their independence and ultimately their way of life.
As to Pilgrim or Chimp (really, we know it’s Joan) – says that I caused her disabilities. OH REALLY? She’s got allergies and irritable bowel syndromes and chronic kidney and bladder infections – how the hell could I cause that?
It got me thinking. I’ve spent many years working in ministry of some sort, and you know what? It’s amazing how critical people can be, even though they aren’t holding that particular ministry position. Think about it. It’s like there’s this mentality that anyone who is a Christian automatically has the right to be an expert about any kind of ministry position. How often do pastors, missionaries, evangelists etc come under scrutiny simply because we think we have the right to tell them how to do their jobs because we share the title Christian. I know the Bible talks about certain perimeters for being in those roles, but just because we read our Bibles and call ourselves by similar names, does not give us the right to offer directives.
On average, our mini sculptures have grown from about 3cm to 4cm tall from tip to tip (including eyepin on top). Some might say that's not much difference but when you work on a miniscule level, this is a %25 increase in size. I decided to make them bigger because even though they weren't necessarily complaints, there were a couple of comments made last year at how surprisingly small my charms were. So they're now bigger! :P
What we create are pale imitations;
Me - High: Being available for my sister.
Looks a little plain and sad with out the pepitas! The color is astounding.
The rezoning would facilitate new mixed-use academic and office buildings. The proposed zoning change would allow the NYC College of Technology and Polytechnic University to expand their academic facilities and develop revenue-producing office buildings within their campuses.
Director : Robert Mandel
As she ran up the stairs, she called out to me. "Cool. But that doesn't sound like Prince Charming. That just sounds like a regular guy."
Shutters not only add that hint of vintage, but provide a fresh new way to stay organized or display memories. I tried this in one of my college apartments. I used old wood slat doors, painted them a beautiful teal, and filled them with pictures. It was definitely a conversation piece!
We are really so very grateful.
Dr Victor Davids
40. Hayseed Dixie - Won't Get Fooled Again (6:47)
A complete stranger is proud of you.
I am lucky enough to get an occasional email from curious readers so I thought I would compile a short list of the frequently asked questions just to clear some things up.
Modern scientific research supports this age-old tenet of medical wisdom. It began in the 1920s, when Harvard scientist Walter Cannon, MD, identified the fight-or-flight response through which the body secretes hormones called catecholamines, such as epinephrine and nonepinephrine. When they enter the blood stream, these hormones produce changes in the body—i.e. a quickened heart or increased breathing rate—that put the person in a better physical state to escape or confront danger.
“We had both been associated with the Oxford Group, Bill in New York, for five months, and I in Akron, for two and a half years. Bill had acquired their idea of service. I had not, but I had done an immense amount of reading they had recommended. I had refreshed my memory of the Good Book, and I had had excellent training in that as a youngster. . . .
I'll try and link up to the following challenges when I can get Internet:
Grace and peace to you all.
Card #3 Morning Star
Gabi and I hiked 47 miles in two days, down South Kaibab and up North Kaibab and then down North Kaibab and up Bright Angel. I will likely make many attempts to find words to describe the experience, but I do so with full knowledge that I will never succeed in capturing the magnitude of this hike. The sights were awe inspiring; the roar of the river and the silence that followed equally deafening; the icy water at Ribbon Falls exhilarating.
We return to our ‘base camp’ Colmurano and are looking forward to the Monti Sibillini National Park tomorrow (if the weather will allow so).
2) Combine ingredients (A) in a small saucepan. Cook on low heat to a gentle boil. Allow to simmer until sugar is dissolved, at least 2-3 minutes. Remove contents from pan and leave to cool completely.
More Minis @ Blogspot will always be your number one stop on the internet for step by step assembly blogs of popular tab and slot dollhouses by Greenleaf and Corona Concepts Dollhouses.
What do you think about Christmas? Do you celebrate it? If so, do you like it? Tell me in the comments below!
We found the trailhead and hiked for about half a mile until we came to the beautiful waterfall above. We stayed for some time to enjoy the waterfall, but then we had to hike back to the car to continue our journey.
2. Heat 3 tbsp olive oil in large skillet over medium-high heat. While pan is heating, season chicken with salt and pepper, then coat each one in flour, then egg, then bread crumbs.
Thus, Things in this Movie that Are Awesome:
Camillo Sitte devoted a large part of his volume to the examination of places^ and to elucidating the principles of their design. He holds, as does generally the modern school of town planners in Germany, that the irregular places of the Middle Ages were definitely designed on sound, artistic lines to produce the definite effects aimed at, and were by no means the result of accidental growth. It is likely that this theory is being pushed farther than the evidence will support. There is, however, no doubt that in the Middle Ages there was such a strong and widely prevalent tradition of the right and wrong in building at any period, that the builders seem at least to have been generally capable of seizing upon accidental irregularities, and making something definitely fitting and beautiful out of them ; so that unconscious growth and conscious design seem to have been working towards much the same end, and probably it is not possible to distinguish between them, nor is it necessary for our purpose. It is enough if we can discover to what is due the pleasing effect produced.
My baby shower was last Saturday. It was a fantastic day. Liam got so many presents it was honestly a bit overwhelming but very appreciated. The kid will never need another bib in his life! And I'm pretty sure he has more clothes than my husband and I combined. :) My sister-in-law, Jackie, had people bring diapers for a raffle. For each package you brought your name was entered into a raffle for (as she likes to say) a fabulous prize. I wish I would have taken pictures of all the diapers we got. There were TONS. I was especially excited because a good percentage of them were organic or natural. Yay. Since Liam's room isn't done yet half of the gifts ended up at my parent's house and half is at our house. Maybe I will try to get a picture when everything eventually makes its way back to my house.
Repeat 12 times (which means that I will probably do this over the course of a week or so)
I have always been a gum fanatic with Bazooka cherry flavor in particular being my lifetime gum of choice. I could always roll with Bubblelicious and Double Bubble in a pinch of course, but I would inevitably return to the master of all gum, Bazooka Joe. In the third grade my mind got blown when I walked into the dime store to buy my usual handful of Bazooka and saw a new product calling out to me from the shelf....GIANT BAZOOKA GUM. "Whaaaaaaaaaaa?!!!!" my nine year old brain shrieked as I shook with excitement. 10 pieces in ONE???? It's GUM and more importantly, it's BIGGER???? IT'S BIG GUM????!!!! This oversized piece of sugar rush overcame all my senses as I yanked it eagerly from the shelf, ran to the cashier, dumped my change and proceeded to stuff the entire jackpot into my mouth.
Their hair was once shoulder-length and what’s left of it now is mostly grey. Two of them are still following the same path they started down in the late Seventies, in a country of soaring unemployment and inflation, where contraception was illegal and divorce was banned. Others of them are now household names, as writers, journalists and commentators. Back then, they were young, unknown and there was no obvious outlet for their talents. So they set about doing it for themselves: in 1977, Niall Stokes and Mairin Sheehy founded Hot Press.
John Heard (Deceived)
i define & i measure
Article 25 In case a right holder's actual loss or an infringer's illegal earnings can't be determined, a people's court shall, upon the request of the parties, or ex officio, apply the stipulation of Item 2 of Article 48 of the Copyright Law to determine the amount of compensation.
You can solve this problem by not being like me and having your character instigate any and all plot points. No action happens outside their view because they create the action. But then you miss out on some interesting plot points.
Rook & Rose – Floral Boutique
Breakfast for Kylie this morning:
It was a gorgeous production - dream-like and full of wonder. And the playing was real - each new performance, we discovered later, was ever so slightly different: the performers continued to experiment and explore even after dozens of shows. Though the show was aimed at the over fives (Littlest was lucky enough to go with her school class), it's entirely fair to say that both Eldest and I got completely lost in the performance. As the lights went down towards evening, and the dancers sat and gathered around a single amber light which floated around them like a firefly, we wanted nothing more than to light a campfire and bed down for the night.
Unlike when you are on a trail and decide you are done and still have to get back to your car. And lets face it, everyone has a day now and then when what is distance or time is less than what was planned. Even has an emergency cord!
“Many people use dialects to contrast with mandarin, which is required and popularized in primary and middle schools in some urban areas,” Qian said.
Harold Shipman can’t be the only GP to have killed patients. His only uniqueness lay in the fact he did it intentionally.
Now in this moment, my heart wants to join in the rhythm of yours and create a new symphony for our own universe.
After Peter left, I did not feel empty or upset. I actually felt empowered…as crazy as that sounds. I was no longer a virgin. I felt like I barely recognized myself, but I accepted it. I no longer embodied the innocent, fearful, shy girl. I had control over my sex life. I HAD a sex life. I also felt so much more relaxed.
One of the main criticisms of Russell T. Davies’ run on Doctor Who is that the stakes were always at a global level. Every week, a monster would threaten to destroy the planet, solar system, galaxy or solar system. It got old. Even those episodes which gave us a break from that tended to be comedic in contrast to the dark, threatening monsters of other weeks.
I give less than a shit how big your dick is. I just like penises. I really do. For a girl who was terrified of male genitalia until she was in her twenties I feel like I really missed out on what could have been some awesome times, had I actually been ready to have sex.
of his father
Simply put - he was doing his job.
The blog author recalls that was probably the most emotional moment! The announcement had brought cheers and roars of approval from the passengers– the joyful moment was even shared on twitter with many people in other parts of Japan. By a simple improvised arrangement, the conductor had instantly become a hero!
It is to be read as a whole, cover to cover, before judgments are issued on its worthiness.
In the spirit of maintaining an all French outfit, Pescarolo stalwart and endurance ace, Christophe Tinseau has been named as the team’s second driver, rejoining the Pescarolo ranks after its twelve month absence. Details of a third driver for the season’s extended endurance events are not yet known.
This is one of my favorite texture artworks. I made it on the spur of the moment, in just a few hours. It came together easily, with no hesitation or agnst. (I always love it when that happens!)
Welcome to another fabulous Wednesday morning challenge at Cookin with Cricut. As our school year begins to start to come to a close, it is time to start working on those Teacher Appreciation Cards.
I open my door and pick up the bottle, and then immediately drop it, resisting the urge to scream "everything is on fire!!" I can even hear that the usually viscous sunscreen in the bottle had turned into a liquid, probably near the point of evaporation. After the outside finally cooled to the point of tangibility, I poured a little bit into my hand, only to find that it had in fact, turned into molten lava. Giving up on that, I head back to the back yard, where I find that every single tool that we left out had gained the ability the melt flesh off of bones...
"I am sure you will. He is a man who has all my respect. He possesses a quality of . . . how to express it? . . . of shibumi."
Shred up chicken. You can use breast meat only or whatever leftover chicken you may have or canned chicken. Stir in 2 Tbsp Mayo (for 2 breasts and 2 thighs worth of chicken) to barely coat.
See ya there :)
The power of advertisers over television programming stems from the simple fact that they buy and pay for the programs-they are the “patrons” who provide the media subsidy. As such, the media compete for their patronage, developing specialized staff to solicit advertisers and necessarily having to explain how their programs serve advertisers’ needs. The choices of these patrons greatly affect the welfare of the media, and the patrons become what William Evan calls “normative reference organizations,” whose requirements and demands the media must accommodate if they are to succeed.
- Mostly busy for work, no time for children
I purchased this for our rescue Monk Parakeet/Quaker parrot, Chicken. Chicken came to us from a woman who worked with Last Chance Sanctuary. All she could tell us of the bird was that, one day when leaving a cleaned cage out by the house to dry–the cage had been empty. The next day, it had been moved closer to the house and Chicken was inside it. So needless to say, we can’t entertain Chicken as much as we could our other birds. Touching or trick training isn’t an option yet, but I wanted to get her something extra for her cage to ensure she’s not bored during the times we spend with our other birds.
– If pedantry were pennies you would be financially soluble right now, my boy. Now please get to the point before I lose my patience.
No.3 is based on a series with the formation law:
Tomorrow's the day... I feel like a child with a new toy... I am jumping up and down to show you...
How do you get to this place?
Recommended by: Amy L. at Main
How about clothes… yes, I am guilty there too. If I liked a particular type of pant I would get a pair in every color. T-shirts? same… and I think I own the entire line of Smartwool base layers, in every color, weight and style. I also owned the entire line of Hannah Andersson women’s collection. Notice the key word here – “OWNED”, past tense…
This is, however, a really bad analogy in at least two ways. First, families have to pay back their debt. Governments don’t — all they need to do is ensure that debt grows more slowly than their tax base. Second — and this is the point almost nobody seems to get — an over-borrowed family owes money to someone else; US debt is, to a large extent, money we owe to ourselves. It’s true that foreigners now hold large claims on the United States, including a fair amount of government debt. But every dollar’s worth of foreign claims on America is matched by 89 cents’ worth of US claims on foreigners. And because foreigners tend to put their US investments into safe, low-yield assets, America actually earns more from its assets abroad than it pays to foreign investors. If your image is of a nation that’s already deep in hock to the Chinese, you’ve been misinformed. Nor are we heading rapidly in that direction. So yes, debt matters. But right now, other things matter more. We need more, not less, government spending to get us out of our unemployment trap. And the wrongheaded, ill-informed obsession with debt is standing in the way.
The "organic" look, in my opinion, of this photo is phenomenal. I loved the contrast between the colors. The different shades of greens and browns are fabulous. I also like the sharp peaks in the back, set against the cloudy sky. How awesome to be living on the plane, like those who've built houses there. The waterfall is the perfect touch to a gorgeous photo. So, how are you inspired?
As we waited in the jacked up waiting area for our flight (it was running a little late, expecting to take off at 5:05 instead of 4:50…no biggy. And the waiting area is jacked up because of a bunch of construction that’s going on in that terminal right now), I noticed the guy sitting across from us was a little jumpy. He dropped his boarding pass on the ground, and didn’t make a move to pick it up. So after a sec, I picked it up for him, and said, “Sir, you dropped your boarding pass.” He took it from me, and then said something about how he was trying to miss this flight. But it wouldn't work out because another one didn’t leave for 2 days.
1/4cup packed fresh cilantro leaves
In a large bowl, combine the milk and bread. Use a fork to mash them together into a thick paste. Add the chiles, 1 1/2 tablespoons of the cilantro, the cumin, coriander, paprika, 1/4 teaspoon of the salt, and 1/4 teaspoon of the pepper. Mix to combine. Add the ground sirloin, and use your hands to gently combine the mixture - don't overwork it. Divide into four equal portions, and shape each into a 1/2-inch thick patty. Use your thumb to make an indentation in the center of each patty (this will keep the burgers from puffing and swelling in the center as they cook). Cover and refrigerate the burgers until you're ready to grill them.
Cara: See answer above, referencing Bugs Bunny. Rebel Rebel.
I have some plans for the other containers. Especially for the little yogourt cups! You will have to wait and see, but maybe you can guess?
The MPS said Mr Mitchell had argued “it would take forever and be difficult” to change the definition of ODA, an atmosphere of relatively wealthy countries.
01 - Shake The House Down 04:13
“Ruby Moore.”
Knocked out a cottage cheese craving with a half cup of the curds, a nectarine (that really didn't want to be pitted), some cranberry granola and a bunch of cinnamon. For some reason, the cinnamon flavor tasted a little off with the cottage cheese, but it didn't bother me enough to throw everything out.
We're over a barrel. How do you undo and defund these psychopaths? We have fanatics around the world who want us dead, and troops spread from here to Bosnia, and beyond. Our debt is as stretched as our military, and as planted on foreign soil.
Share with us two “teaser” sentences from somewhere on that page.
Viognier: This medium to full body wine is known for its intense bouquet of dried apricot, flowers, stone fruit, and musky perfume. It generally has a high alcoholic content and a medium to full body. It is the most predominant white grape of the few produced in northern Rhone; however, curious oenologists world over are yielding good results.
I hope this post helps anybody currently looking to profit from attraction marketing!
But in the end, breast cancer was just too much for a 92 year old woman to fight. And even though I was grateful for her long, beautiful life and her precious spirit and the gift of faith she gave all of us, I was angry. Angry that she had to spend so many years fighting a disease that ravaged her body. Her cancer was not a tragedy in the way that it is for the young men and women who have lost their own fights with the disease. She was able to see her children, her grandchildren and even some great-grandchildren grow up. But she did suffer. And that is reason enough for me to hope for a cure.
And also water
For the butterflies, first print and cut out image from here. Apply distress inks with a small cut piece of a makeup spong. Then apply Glossy accents and allow to dry. The antennae is made out of a piece of wire from a twisty-tie and colored with a Sharpie pen.
But many have asked us, "what now?"
I've been remarkably busy doing what seems to be not much, but it has been a very enjoyable break. Christmas was delightful, I spent Christmas Eve with my big sister at her house, Christmas Day with my family, and Boxing Day with Levi's family (who were kind enough to pick me up from the train halfway, which meant I could still spend the morning with my aunty & co who were over from interstate rather than taking a different train the whole two hours at 9am, so props to them) and then a nice break between Christmas and New Years with Mum and Dad. I even had a friend's 21st on New Years' Eve, which was amazingly fun, I've known her since pre-primary (so about fifteen years!) and I don't see her nearly enough any more.
NIXON (Stephen L. Rivele & Christopher Wilkinson & Oliver Stone)
getting at this critical information from the “outside in.” What do your
Looking more closely at this scripture, it’s more of a love issue than a money issue. Where we set our affections will either be our victory or our demise. It’s up to us.
* ¼ teaspoon ground ginger
Corscia Studios - Another alternative nightclub venue set under the railway arches in Elephant and Castle. A very friendly venue with excellent music on every weekend.
DiCarlo’s is unlike any other pizza. It is sold by the piece or by the tray. The pizza dough is first baked in several different ovens,of varying degrees, the result being a very crisp bottom with a tender top . (I love the corner pieces. Before the last baking, the sauce is applied and heated. It does not soak the crust and remains just a layer. The crust and sauce is then removed and put in the red and white DiCarlo’s box. Cheese and slices of pepperoni are added. The lid is slammed shut and the intense heat inside steams the cheese and pepperoni, causing it to become the stringy cheese that most desire, with the pepperoni tender and not hard baked.
For a brief second I flirted with fear and loathing for my mistakes but I pushed it aside because I had to. She is watching me. So I turned my focus to being grateful for where I am and for what inspired me to care about where I am.
Lt. General Donald L. Kerrick, USA (Ret.)
Same old strafe from two till four,
Question #2: What is currently your biggest organizing dilemma? What type of advice are you patiently waiting for?
"Cause I am going to wear it."
Thanks for everything Karen, you will be missed!
Anyway the two ‘people’s champions have split following a bitter dispute between the two over the lawyer’s refusal to stop writing a column for a newspaper owned by Rupert Murdoch.
I wasn’t home for much of this past weekend. I could have blogged from my folks’ house, I guess, but my dad has this evil ergonomic keyboard. The keys are in this crazy sinkhole arrangement and until I get one of my own and use it for a while it is just too much torture to try and type on it. It’s evil.
But I've always been there.
Swiss-born and educated Marc Faber’s distinct voice is a common sound on CNBC and Bloomberg TV when it comes to big-picture forecasting in investments. The contrarian views of his “Gloom, Boom & Doom Report” often garner headlines, but Faber does go along with the crowd when it comes to pointing out the dangers of rising government debt and unabated monetary intervention. HAI Managing Editor Drew Voros caught up with Faber at his Hong Kong residence and spoke to him about gold, the Treasury market, which countries should be out of the eurozone and what an ideal portfolio allocation looks like.
Perfectly clear? Holder was grilled repeatedly by Republican Senators during his Judiciary testimony, asking him to make perfectly clear if states are failing to adequately punish hate criminals. Holder couldn't present even one example of such failure on the local level.
I'm looking forward to the cruise and not worrying about the health of my sweet Mocha. I think I cried myself out yesterday and the evening before and I hope to just enjoy the vacation with my husband.
The name Chattahoochee, yes, I looked it up, actually means “rock painted” as in there are rocks all along its banks, but it’s not the Colorado or the Missouri with rolling rapids and precarious sections. It’s not Big Water. It’s primarily known for being cold all the time as floating down the “Hooch” on blistering, hot summer days is still a pastime. Scary water? No. Cold water? Yes.
Kids who want to use drugs will figure out a way to get around these tactics. Kids who aren't using drugs will feel like criminals if we treat them as such. Maybe your best bet is to drop your weapons, and approach your child in a peaceful way. If you want more than just random reassurance that your child is not on drugs, try taking the advice of another expert from the same article:
As usual I arrived at the store half hour early, talked with fellow dm’s a bit (2 dm’s had to cancel, leaving us short, and fearing either huge 10+ parties, or having to urn people away, which was an impossibility.) If only I could divide myself into 2 dm’s. In the end I think a brand new player stepped up to dm, and a veteran player of 4e offered to assist, and the table had a good time.
info: I find Karuta’s name really interesting. I’m currently watching this anime called “Chihayafuru” which is about teenagers playing “karuta”, a card game about a hundred poems in Japan. I think it’s really cute. And intriguing, that’s she’s named Karuta.
Our bond in life remains.
he will keep your life.
So hard to choose just one winner, but random.org has chosen for us and our winner this time is:
a splash of red against the green
In another bowl mix all the wet ingredients and mix thouroughly.
No one was standing behind them telling them to say "thank you." In fact, no one even suggested or implied that my children should do these things. Most were not even asked for. It became clear to me that the reason they did all of these kind things (which is not just a recent phenomenon, by the way) was for the best reason of all - because they wanted to.
If you are using crosses, mix together the flour and water until you have a paste that will drop off a spoon. Fill a small plastic bag (I use a glad bag) and snip off the corner to leave a hole about 1mm across.
When you are ready to serve, dust the top of the cake with confectioners' sugar.
Off I went, to investigate Wordpress. I now have another blog...floating in space, deciding whether I tie it down or let in linger in Never Never Land for another day. As I sat and looked at it, I thought, do I really want to do this? Learn another set of complicated instructions? Is my brain matter capable of this? I decided that is wasn't and sat patiently, waiting for Blogger's return.
- In a small bowl, mix 1/2 c greek yogurt, 1/4 c lemon juice, 1/4 c honey and 1/4 c dil
I was going over my blog when she was here a few weeks ago. She saw my picture and said "that picture doesn't look like you". I knew what she meant, my hair is starting to get longer. I was thinking to myself - it was just taken a few months ago - well maybe more than a few. It really can't be that old.....
She now has a small team that works to create jewelry. Her designs feature the best of rustic elegance and trendy looks, with the end result being quality jewelry that will look as new and fresh years from now as it does today. Each piece is custom made using sterling silver, stainless steel, natural stones, and the finest components.
Personally, I learned free motion by mastering one design at a time. I learned Stippling from the first machine quilting class I took back in 2006, and pretty much stippled every quilt I made for 2 years.
My goal is to soften things up, either adding upholstered chairs or seat cushions on wood chairs. After much back and forth, I think we have finally made our selection, but out of curiosity, I wondered what my design savvy readers would choose! So please, weigh in, let me know what you would choose from the chairs I have gathered below or something else you have come across.
box of drammamine
And pull it off he did. Posterity hasn’t been kind to Maclaren-Ross, depriving him off his deserved prominence in English literature, but his work speaks for itself. The Collected Memoirs contain a considerable range of topics, anecdotes and incidents written in a variety of styles. The highly literary childhood reminiscences in The Weeping and the Laughter, with their evocative descriptions and vivid narrative syntax, recall the work of Vladimir Nabokov. They are full of brilliantly eccentric characters, numerous idiosyncrasies, acutely deadpan humour – in fact, these qualities pepper the memoirs throughout. Lackadaisical passages slowly unfold with droll interpositions and qualifications, vibrantly recapturing the fears and fixations that define the lives of “delicate” children. And then there is Maclaren-Ross’ father, the most important of the book’s characters. Speaking of him in The Coloured Alphabet, he recalls: “He discouraged, even in wartime, anything likely to promote hatred between nations and would not countenance the use of the term Boche nor allow me to draw the Kaiser’s head on the shell of my breakfast-egg and then smash it in with a spoon, as other children did. This attitude, combined with his dislike of all militarism, which as an ex-officer wounded in the Boer War he felt entitled to express whenever he liked, was apt to be misunderstood when aired in public, and led to his half-strangling a man on a bus who accused him of being unpatriotic and pro-German.” Another character of note is Maclaren-Ross’ nanny, who was Belgian and whom he called Nanna. We learn that “She had an accent in speaking English not dissimilar from that of the French governess in Uncle Silas, if what she said were phonetically rendered and though her disciplinary methods did not resemble those of this fictional prototype, they were at the time quite severe enough to keep me in check. She also had a moustache which prickled unpleasantly when she kissed me; this did not happen often, luckily, as all demonstrations of affection were kept for public exhibition only: in private our relations were on a strictly practical plain…Unbeknown to me, however, Nanna’s days with us were numbered. It was a passion for atrocity stories that finally earned her the sack.”
How do you guys feel about Endermen. I imagine that we all share the same feeling. Well, one person decided to create a little “tribute” to our dear friend, the Enderman. You may have seen some of his videos before. They are known to be quite…explosive. Let’s take a look.
Favorite Food:
Oh yeah, and to make the best use of my materials, I made the wood photos reversible. I made seven total, so I can mix and match and use either side to my little heart's content whenever I get bored of doing the same arrangement every time.
Conditions can make you scurf
The things that the BFG says and the way he says them are beautiful. He may be uneducated in the sense of schooling but he has a raw knowledge that cannot be taught but can be learned. Such brilliant words in the BFG's vocabulary are, "bundongle," "chiddler," and "phizzwizard."
Since 1924, the merry magic of Macy’s has been on display for generations to enjoy and cherish. Started by a small group of dedicated employees who gathered to celebrate freedom and give thanks with band instruments and clown makeup, the Parade to this day is the greatest volunteer effort Macy’s gives to the nation. From clowns to balloon handlers and a slew of behind-the-scenes jobs, the Macy’s Parade is a labor of love for all those who continue to gather on Thanksgiving Day. While every job is important, no one position can quite compare to that of executive producer.
Hope you all are having a wonderful Easter week. If you need some oh so lovely table setting or dessert inspiration go see my sis here. :)
Bureau of Immigration alarmed, issues stricter guidelines on aliens
On the north side of East Broadway, however, these sorts of historical structures east of the Seward Park Library were knocked down and replaced in the 1950s with an immense cooperative village in the fashion of Stuyvesant Town, a series of housing towers interlocked with open spaces and playgrounds.
Below the cliffs in front of me,
I decided that I needed to make a small investment in this project to maintain strong long term results. And more importantly, I wanted to provide us with a much safer way to store our sharp belongings.
Repeat with remaining dough, arranging 4 pieces per baking sheet.
Regardless, I thought it was a pretty unusual piece. We’ll probably display it in our office or bedroom when they are redone.
Time: 10:00 am to 1:00 pm
Patrick Leahy, the chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee has reportedly been working on introducing the amendments to S.1145 for several days and even reserved the television studio two days in a row this week, only to cancel both times. Support for the bill does not appear to be strong at this time - the CQ article notes that Leahy acknowledged that he "will need every vote he can find to advance the bill through the Senate."
As the congregation filed out, a woman whose husband had left her, resulting in deep financial trials, and whose children were not walking with Christ, asked him the simple question, “What am I supposed to be thankful for, Pastor? I have nothing that you spoke of this morning.” And she left.
everything just seems to sound the same yeah
I used one of my favorite DP (Basic Gray). Added flowers, faux stitching and Whiff of Joy swirls.
Chain 5 and with a slip stitch form a ring.
4) Never Important…Fame.
His eyes flicked up to meet hers, narrow again with suspicion. "By the Wildren who were Coercing me. Or blackmailing me, whatever you want to call it." At that, his frown turned bitter, outright angry. What could she say to placate him? Before she could think it through, he pushed on. "No-one else knew I was involved. No-one."
I hope the person that received this enjoys it, as much as I enjoyed creating it. Thank you for looking and until next time....Enjoy.
Which ending do you prefer? Would you mind helping me decide?
I wanted to clarify (because I often get questions about it), the posts tagged "Personal" are semi-autobiographical based fiction that I've been playing around with for a novel I'm writing. They're meant to be read as part of a whole. And the timeline is intentionally distorted. I hope that answered the question.
04) I Live In A Car
Anyhow on a brigher note this lovely girl from Northern Ireland featured me on her blog about Gracie's Corner (My Etsy) and other Etsy Northern Ireland Crafters :)
"Friends are family you choose for yourself" Ever heard that quote? It's so true and I have the most wonderful, supportive extended family I could ever dream of having. They support me when I'm down, the encourage me when I'm trying, they make me laugh when I'm crying and sometimes just sit and hold my hand. My friends rock!
"When I was a boy," my father said,
Distinguishing Features: GREEN EYES
04. Shaking hearts 4:09
Yesterday, I came across this great post about the importance and impact of the online writing community to all writers, aspiring and published. I wanted to add my two cents in because I feel that without the irreplaceable support group found in the online writing community, I probably wouldn't have kept writing.
Stay tuned to this blog and the official Star Blazers website for more news and information on SPACE BATTLESHIP YAMATO: 2199 as they develop — and soon, we'll be off to outer space, in your living room!
If you want to keep up to date on what’s happening on this blog? You can subscribe, see the link to the left of the articles heading – Follow Blog by Email
Santa, please bring this blue boy a plane!
However, conferences have also been a great place for me to meet other agents and editors. Of course, since I’m in NYC and meet editors regularly, I can limit my travel for this, but still, I often meet new industry people at conferences.
Addison smiled devilishly as she wrapped her arms around Christian’s neck, a whiney babyish voice escaping her lips, “But I want to be your naughty girl Christian.”
Yes, they are witnesses, until proven guilty, that’s what OCPD Gan Kong Meng said. He revealed their photos to the press, saying he had downloaded them from newspapers and the internet.
It's been an incredible journey over this last year watching this fun loving little guy. He is his parents first baby and the joy he brings to them is such a treasure! Love you Frankie and family!
Tonight after visiting with the repair man and getting details of the repair there was no stress. Again, there was no resistance to what was. There was no taking the situation personally. I know I used to personalize EVERYTHING. “WHY IS THE HAPPENING TO ME??!!” would have been my immediate response to something like this. Or I might argue, what did I do to deserve this or perhaps “this isn’t fair!!!
I was watching Glee last Tuesday night. If you don't know Glee is an awesome show about a high school Glee club with lots of singing and dancing and a sexy teacher. Anyway, on the commercial break I went to the computer to check my facebook page and such. When I got onto my page I discovered I had a new message. I looked in my message inbox and to my utter astonishment I had been sent a message from none other than my long lost father whom I had never met.
I follow a couple of blogs that do Menu Plan Monday. Suzanne and Jessie, I am looking at you. I haven't really attempted it before and I don't have links for my recipes but I thought this would be a good time to start....mostly because payday is Friday and I may have to get creative with what we have in the house.
All of these things, placed within the creative mind, await the power of your imagination to live. What visions do you have of Xuankong Si and Roussanou? What adventures await those that travel to the exotic Aeries of Heaven?
"Good" by Better Than Ezra - The first song I had ever heard by these guys. For a while after the release of How Does Your Garden Grow this was my favorite band.
Built on Land – Lost During Last Pole Shift?
Recent immigrants tended to vote for Labour.
So, what did we have this morning? Two mommies standing in a corner chatting, four mommies sitting on the floor gossiping and sipping coffee, the teacher, and good old muzzy-headed me. At one point the teacher walked over to me and said "It's nice to have one parent watching the kids." Annoyed by this time, I replied, "Maybe they're discussing something really juicy, like their sex lives. I guess they don't care whether any kids get hurt or not."
We went to the farmers market the other night. The weather was absolutely perfect. We were eating cherries and strawberries and walking around. Kai asked for a coin to make a wish in the fountain. I gave him a dime because they are lucky (I used to tape one to my shin guard during soccer games in college).
In contrast, PETA is best-known for its obnoxious and often sexist publicity stunts and gaudy self-promotion, appealing to the lower aspects of human attitudes and behavior. Sadly, PETA cannot even attempt to speak with moral authority because it would so blatantly contradict their attitudes and actions as manifested in “Save the Whales” billboards that make fun of female obesity, banned television advertisements, and sexist campaigns like “I’d Rather Go Naked Than Wear Fur”.
Beside it was a stag, a stag of the same astonishing beauty as the squirrel that sat next to it; it seemed almost to be straight out of a dream. Alice gazed at it in awe, wished that she could gaze at it forever, but it turned and cantered off from the path, out of sight, and the squirrel followed it.
And finally we have O'Chocos by LoveMore. I've purchased their Custard Creams for my mum before but I'd never seen their Oreo-style cookie. The biscuits are more crunchy but they're a great gf version my only issue was that they're not soy free.
There seems to be some speculation as to why the Epping Forest branch of the British National Party are not standing candidates in this years elections (click here)
My optimistic solution to that obstacle? Brain boosts. Smart pills. For everybody. (oh, please!) If we can get those, without major side effects, then maybe... just maybe... those stars.
gates. She saw a beautiful banquet table. Sitting all around were her
Her name is Gina and she makes Regalias.
Feel the rain on your skin
One of my favorite breakfasts on a cold morning, and it is really good for you (minus the brown sugar maybe :)
In our mind's eye no matter what he does or has done, Giuliani will always be on a perpetual tape loop playing footage of him amidst the rubble of the World Trade Center. I think conservatives are hoping that a Giuliani presidency will be a lot like a movie, specifically the movie Groundhog Day; that is, if it took place on September 11 instead of February 2. In that movie Bill Murray not only relived a single day over and over, he improved over time. Every day he became a better and better person and eventually won the heart of Andie MacDowell (whose acting skills, oddly, never did improve). Imagine a Giuliani who started with how he was on September 11 and just got better. Imagine a President who actually learned from his mistakes. In the movie Bill Murray was even able to prevent bad things from happening before they occurred. After reliving September 11 over and over, perhaps eventually Giuliani would be able to stop a terrorist attack before it happened. After 1,459 days of September 11, maybe we could get it right this time. But then again, that might just put us right back to September 10. I guess what worries some people is which Giuliani would show up on that day?
9. Terms of Endearment (Debra Winger) - An all time favorite. Shirley Maclaine’s character is more memorable than some of the real people in my life.
Photo Images: New York Magazine, Warner Brothers, Catherine Martin, The Daily Mail
He broke me
I have some winter clothes out and all my summer things still out so the dressing room is not my favorite room right now.
and then it started raining. we put up the pop up, secured tarps around the outside and even set up a space heater to keep warm. we passed some time playing games and laughing and again, it was fun. when the rain let up a little, we took a trip out to walmart to get some things that we needed-a jacket for the baby, a wind fly for the pop up, some mat's to keep mud out of the tents, you know, essentials.
former of warmth and lift,
Answer: Right here in this office, firing you.
I am so excited to have the opportunity to host a SUPER Skincare Dr. Perricone Giveaway! One Tidbits From A Mom reader will win their choice of SUPER skincare product! Please fill out the Rafflecopter form below to enter.
We had the good fortune to be escorted to Mount Harriet (Look at the Lighthouse on the back of a 20 Re. note..), by a Muslim Malayali (Moplah), who was the grandson of two freedom fighters, both imprisoned in the cellular jail at Andaman. He told us that all the cruelty described to us in the light and sound show was true and it was even worse in reality. He told us how pained he felt to re-live that torture since it was his own grandfathers who suffered. We told him that we too feel the pain very acutely. He said that his grandfathers were honoured by the Kerala Govt as well as by Rajiv and Sonia gandhi when they visited the Andamans. And that the diaries maintained by his grandfathers were read out on the radio on some programs.
we were like a fish who met its water
With a derisive snort, he turned from her and made his way out...
All this for a Friday special of $12 dollars plus coke and tip.
Okay, so what have I been up to in the classroom? Well, for 100s day, I never got to make those cute little 100 year old people from Finally in First. So we made them when we started talking about Ben Franklin in our Reading series. We talked about how things have changed through the years. I wanted them to write what they thought the world would be like 100 years from now. Here's a couple pictures of their people and their writing.
Example: Dwayne Jarrett scores a touchdown. You (aka me), to anyone willing to listen: “Do you want to change your name to Jarrett Junior? The kids can call you Jarre-Ju!”
I don't know what SERE school is. I can intuit that it's some sort of military tactics school from context but acronyms are a risk you can avoid simply by leaving it out.
In the HEBREW, the main word for “content”= Ya’al, means “to show willingness, to undertake, to be determined.”
it was the worst sound i will ever hear in my life.
These days, Abdullahi looks anything but downtrodden. She adores fashion (which can be quite an expensive habit, even in Kano) and goes a little starry-eyed when listing the hoped-for qualities of her soon-to-be-found husband. She may not be romantic but can’t help dreaming big.
As I rose, a red button was pushed.
The underlying premise of Sanctus is enticing - an ancient citadel in Turkish city that is possibly one of the old permanently and consistently inhabited places on earth. The citadel is home to a very reclusive order of monks who are rarely if ever seen out of the place. Rumours abound that they hold a very very dark secret inside the mountain that they have built on. One day a monk is seen standing on the very top of the mountain and suddenly he plunges to his death.
Weather forecast looks decidedly gloomy with really low temperatures forecast for the next couple of days. A couple of boats have gone past heading for Braunston wont be too long before we may be joining them.
Tie one bead onto the end of each string. Make sure it is securely tied.
“This is just one contractual relationship,” Randy Nussbaum, managing partner of a law firm that represented Hammer and Haile, told The Arizona Republic. “The macro view of this is, if it’s true that anyone who has a contractual relationship with anyone dispensing medical marijuana and that contract is not enforceable, how does anyone enforce a legitimate contract in this business?”
Meanwhile, the 6e is easier for me to find lots and lots of yummies--this is where I learned the art of window shopping. Most of the time, all I need when I go shopping is to see something beautiful--and this is a state of being I learned in the 6e. Over by St-Suplice, there used to be a Jean-Paul Gaultier shop (I don't know if it's still there) and I would take long walks just to see it, then turn around ready for my day of writing, completely satiated. Will that be the case this time? Maybe not. I've heard Hermès has a new boutique in this arrondissement, at 17 rue des Sèvres, just a hop, skip, and jump from our apartment this vacation.
Sure, I'm being emotional. But lookie (or listen) here to one of the doctors (Dr. Allen Frances, God bless 'em) responsible for the diagnosis of bi-polar in the DSM 4. Also, listen to how the mother totally ignores his plea that too many kids are being medicated for being difficult to raise. He's being very, very reasonable in my book. I don't see that much among scientists (cough, cough, BC, cough). Fear of mental illness does not lead to good parenting.
That's IT!!! Exclaims Blue Monkey. ( and yes..I am beginning to get leary of Blue Monkey's exclamations) We are....(drumroll please)..
My story has a lot of holes in it. Not “plot holes”–I mean big gaping empty story holes that I never bothered to fill (that I didn’t realize needed to be filled) with action and description and character. With one event following another. On a side note: it’s not as easy to type with a small cat resting on your forearm as without, but if it has to be done then it has to be done.
Sommer is not opposed to historical critical methods of interpretation. In his scholarly work he capably demonstrates their useful and productive implementation; he stresses, however, the limits of their use, particularly for biblical theology (they are necessary but not sufficient). A leading scholar in the field of biblical theology in my own estimation, I am pleased to highlight here his work and commend it to you.
Sponge brush
This post is intended as a lament of sorts, a lament for something in the culture that is dying and may never been seen again.
Books – These are the books that I have personally read and can recommend as being worth the money.
luxurious home. Let's take a tour shall we?
Hmm.. May 1st. It was not an interesting day whatsoever. The only slightly amusing part of my day was that my last caller today was actually very pleasent to speak with AND understood that it is not my fault that his hotel room was dirty. I’m not sure if I’ve posted this yet or not, but I now work in a hotel call center. To be specific, I work in the customer care department. Here’s an idea, did you ever think that its not my fault simply because of the fact I AM NOT at the property? Simple. I received another little surprise when I opened my mailbox when Punki and I arrived home. My new Scrapbooks Etc magazine was waiting for me, along with various fast food coupons (nothing good) and random flyers addressed to current resident. So tonight, after Punki and I had our supper, Punki took his bath, and I finally got him down for bed, I sat with my new magazine, ice cream and a beer.
Buick MacKane by Ty Segall
See how those panels give it a little more room? No more sausage casing.
The London May Day has been a unique bringing together of trade unionists, workers from the many international communities in London, pensioners, anti-globalisation organisations, students, political bodies and many others in a show of working class unity (see our supporters list). The whole theme of May Day is unity and solidarity – across the city, across the country, across the world. Three constant calls have been made – trade union rights, human rights, international solidarity. We have been proud that a vital and major part of the March are workers from the different international communities in London – a practical expression of working class solidarity. Along with the solid support of trade union organisations, these have been the bed rocks of LMDOC
Not a Western, but also part of this batch of titles is Budd Boetticher’s The Killer Is Loose (1956). Released the same year as Seven Men From Now, this is not to be missed.
49. Scotland has the highest proportion of redheads in the world. Around 13 per cent of the population has red hair, with 40 per cent carrying the recessive gene.
Last week was National Library week and the lovely Sarah of Songbird Sweets had the genius idea to cookie a few of her favorite books in honor of this literary celebration. She asked a couple of her friends to join in filling a cookie bookshelf of our favorite books.
Sis- "you know that lady did nothing wrong and I was there!! Unbeliveable. I'm not ever having any conversation w you again! hope ur happy have a good person fired over doing nothing wrong and u know that! money going back into ur account! mail my check!"
Devon Carter is a man on a mission. He’s bound and determined to be a leader in the business world and is willing to give his life (or at least his hand in marriage) to achieve his goals. When Ashley’s father offers the proposition: Marry my daughter and you can take over my company, Devon’s desires are put to the test.
Which leads me to this post.
I offer you my apologies for any time I have made you
Ann and Michael Ramage
In argument of his first reason, mayor Thielemans can only turn down a march, based on security reasons, if the local police had so advised him. As the police gave their permission, mayor Thielemans has gone beyond the remit of his office.
If you get a salary, be sure to use your take-home pay rather than your gross pay. Taxes are usually taken out automatically, but if they’re not, remember to include them as another expense. If you receive money from somewhere not listed, enter the source along with the amount under “other income.”
However, this news surprises me (only because it shows that others feel like she's awesome in similar ways):
Admittedly, those were my expectations about a movie that is about a heist of the mind. Instead, what "Inception" becomes throughout its running time is a James Bond/Mission: Impossible movie, which is not good for someone who generally finds those type of films rather dull. The literal-minded James Bond aesthetic, in particular, represents the polar opposite of the unattainable life of the mind that is Nolan's premise. When your dream movie contains ski shootout sequences that have plagued James Bond movies for decades, perhaps those dreams needed a bigger dose of the surreal.
4 litres Chicken Stock (approx.)
But my baby is small, So I think afterall,
Some Texans, like Taylor, live completely on the other side of the $6.2 million-a-mile wall. Others had their property split in half by the fence, after the government seized portions of their land. At least 200 people in Cameron County had some of their land seized for the fence.
So while his hipster affectations may bug 'serious' UFO scholars, I think Walken is ideally cast, for no one else could so gamely tread the line between obnoxious and endearing, and have enough experience acting in 70s movies like The Deer Hunter and Dogs of War to be able to bring in the moral ambiguity and sense of a man dancing on the edge of a straight razor like a dosed Marx Brother to keep from screaming and winding up in Bellevue. He masterfully conveys the realization via hypnosis that all the things that happened in his childhood didn't 'happen' but are still happening, now, right in the hypnotist's office; that the African figures on the mantle (below) are simultaneously the greys standing in the distance watching him do the herky jerky in the grungy space ship. (Look close in the right quadrant of the bottom picture).
The problem is, on a limited income, you have more hope of catching a glimpse of the Easter Bunny relaxing down at the beach.
Today is Día de la Memoria, which marks the anniversary of the coup d'état in 1976 that started the dictatorial rule of the Proceso . This seems like such a long time ago, but yes it still is strongly in the memories of the people here, and often crops up in the most unlikely places.
Differing opinions don’t
Mr. Warren Cohn, Congressman Edolphus Towns Office- 718-855-8018
Wall Street banks and firms sit on $7 trillion in deposits, refusing to invest in job creation while whining that the nation is "broke" and must accept cutbacks, layoffs and austerity, he charged.
Or with a saber made me bleed
There's always something going on around the Arc de Triomphe. And with all the traffic that whizzes around there day in and day out, no lane markings and the rule of priority to those entering the circle, it's always has a kind of crazy and kinetic feel that is a strange contrast to the majesty and sheer size of the monument.
Second, there are the “awful, awful” Nietzscheans. They at least pay Nietzsche the compliment of taking him seriously. They are typified by the footnote in an old Catholic textbook on modern philosophy, which said only that Nietzsche existed, was an atheist and died insane — a fate which may well await anyone who looks too long into his books.
So, how did I end up with pumpkin puke walls? By throwing caution to the wind and choosing my paint colors at the store.
Saul could have argued that he was not persecuting Jesus but only the disciples of Jesus. At that stage he knew better than to argue for he knew Who was speaking to him. If he was persecuting the members of the Kingdom Church he was persecuting the King.
Jessica Chastain, The Help
The one thing I didn't teach her? How to skate away, clean as a whistle, with all of the money. That trick was still mine. Or was it? I caught a glimpse of a burgundy leather duffel peak out from under the bed. I knew it too well. It belonged Fat Sam, my bank in the region. He held on to my dough, banked it under his name for a hearty cut. Little did I know that Fat Sam also wanted a piece of her chicken wing.
During her whirlwind promotional tour here, the good-hearted actress graced charity screenings for Swiss Watch Extraordinaire, Richard Mille and the Malaysian Chinese Women Entrepeneurs Association.
It is the contention of RADNET that, the differential between the high-level waste derived from low burn-up spent fuel for weapons production versus that derived from high burn-up spent fuel for commercial nuclear electricity production not withstanding, there is a discrepancy in the IDB such that it appears that +/- 4 billion curies of high-level waste are unaccounted for. The BEMR provides clear evidence of many potential locations for the uncontained release of these missing wastes; if Mr. Wisenbaker is correct and no deep well injection of high-level wastes occurred, it would seem clear that the great majority of the curic inventories of the missing high-level waste can be accounted for by their dilution and subsequent reclassification as low-level wastes prior to deep well injection or other uncontained release.
Langhorne Creek (85%), McLaren Vale (15%)
"It's as if they've been planning it for months," she said.
June 23 Atlantic City, NJ 2012 Orion Music + More @ Bader Airfield
The culmination of, for me, eight months reading, arguing, advocating - in a word, judging - came this week when the winner of the Booktrust Teenage Prize was announced. This was Gregory Hughes' début novel Unhooking the Moon (Quercus).
What are you thinking about? If your mind is controlled by the bad economy, the recession, the unemployment, the unfairness of the company, the hurt of a past relationship, or the limitations of your formal education, your “horse” will be taking you toward scarcity, misery, and unhappiness.
I marched into his Study, moved things aside on his desk to accommodate a place setting.
O Goddess of Spring,
While exploring the living things which made their home on a rotting alder log, I came upon something new to me. It was patch of what I initially though to be miniscule mushrooms with black glossy caps.
A couple of years ago, I stood in my doorway and watched a summer rain. And then I lost my mind and took off my watch and changed from my semi-nice sandals into my rubbery flip flops and went out side in the rain. Oh sure, I realize that people driving by probably thought I had a couple of screws loose, but I lived near the Rails to Trails, so I just started walking. And smiling. It was really raining. I didn’t hear any thunder, so I thought my chances of getting struck by lightning were slim, so I walked on the trail, and since there were no other crazy people out there beside myself, I was able to giggle a bit at my spontaneous moment.
Now as his re-election looms he is straddling the issue once again.
4) I sulked.
5. Think small. Some of the most favored stuffed animals have been very small ones. Burger King toys like plastic animals and action figures are long lasting in this house. Why spend $5-10 on a Spiderman action figure at the store when the BK or MCD's kids meal version pleases them just as much? (Should kids be eating BK and MCD's? That's another post, but, if you do eat there (in moderation), the toys have a lot longer staying power than you'd think. On the small side, my favorite baby doll, the Corolle 12" doll has been a big hit in my house and in others as I've started to give this doll as a gift. It is small and soft-bodied, machine washable and does not require batteries. It is easy to carry and kids love it. Most of the dolls on the market have hard plastic bodies and require batteries. I don't think a doll should cry, eat, talk etc. I think the child should imagine that the doll does these things. Bells and whistles look fun in the store, but I think less is more when it comes to dolls.
It’s disappointing as our defence of late, had been solid and we hadn’t been leaking goals in the fashion we did yesterday.
But of course that's silly. I couldn't avoid these quarter boxes if I tried. Some sampling of what I found:
Tutoring
CAPE COD WASTEWATER GOVERNANCE WORKSHOP – Thursday, May 10th – 9:00 AM – 4:30 PM – “Rowing in the Same Direction: Coming Together to Restore Cape Cod Coastal Waters in New Ways”
I never actually go to use my own flies for fishing but I did go fishing with him once.
That said, American History X is one of those films I do not particularly enjoy outside of Norton’s performance. Even with that, I think the film features his worst performance ever. I blame it mostly on the material. American History X wants to say something profound, but just does not have the voice. Some elements come off as far too convenient to be believed. Others are far too preachy. The original ending is so cynical, it wound up being dialed down to the tragedy of the main character’s effort to fail. How depressing is that?
OILS and FATS
A man was walking by. He took a few coins from his pocket and dropped them into the hat. He then took the sign, turned it around, and wrote some words. He put the sign back so that everyone who walked by would see the new words.
Jesse and his sister are illegal immigrants who’ve spent their family’s savings to get to America and pursue that elusive dream of a better life. They both turn tricks to survive, a sacrifice Jesse makes to help ease the burden on his sister. Jesse’s learned to be gay-for-pay, and while he hates every moment of it, he does what he has to. The American dream has left him with few options.
Our next set of Vancouver (and surrounding area) photos are here:
When high waisted pants first came out I tried on various commercial jeans, but nothing really looked right on me. I had a mental image of what I would look like in these amazing pants and where they might take me. But when I would stand in the dressing room all I could see was a large expanse of arse staring back at me. After years of 6cm flys, adding that much fabric to your behind takes some adjusting in the visual memory. So feeling like I had just gained a good 10 kilos, I put those pants back on the rack.
A couple of minutes later waitress returned with the affirmative nod to go ahead and cook.It met their meticulous standard.
A couple of kilometres further he was forced off the road by 4 traffic police vehicles.
as a member of the Design Team @ Bird is the Word.
4 – 7 p.m. New Belgium Brewing Company, Sampling in the Beer
follow it and there is no end.
Are you on Pinterest? If so, let me know so I can follow you! If you'd like to check out more of my foodie pins (or home decor or any other kind for that matter) I can be found here.
Day two is similar, but with a focus on engaging suppliers, NGOs, and the media.
if they started to cry.....
Not to pass judgment,
But, since I still have plenty left of both fabrics I guess that now I can make smaller lunch bags and have a complete set. LOL
Kno “College Blitz” Program visited students at 25 college’s nationwide to promote Kno’s mission to shake up higher education by making learning engaging, efficient, and social for students! Students acted as Brand Ambassadors and Campus Reps by used their own social media accounts to further spread Kno’s message and benefits to not only their peers, but also Teacher’s Assistants and Professors. Students were able to participate in live demonstrations and collect Kno handouts to pass out in dining halls, classes, and dorms!
~Princess keyboard
Olive Oil/Lemon Juice/Freshly Ground Pepper/Onion Salt
1 cup of coffee with cream and cane sugar to go
out of hibernation!!
unexplained or excessive weight gain
Always... I am thankful that he has a job that he loves and that he comes home safe to me in the mornings.
“Heyy.. I’m going back tomorrow. We couldn’t meet this time too.”
Today I have a post up over at The Paper Bakery sharing a fun little Mother's Day gift bag I made using the May add-on kit, which goes live on the 15th!! If you have been thinking about getting a sub, trust me, this is the month to do it!! :)
Knit in Stockinette Stitch for about 21" & finish off with 6 rounds garter stitch.
I red sweet pepper, cut into ¼-inch slices
Oh yeah, and Mom, I have pictures from Old Fort Bliss, but they're on my camera. And it's 12:30am on Sunday morning, and I should probably go to bed. But I'll try and get them on for tomorrows post. I'll try :)
Wariner owned the 400 in the middle of this decade winning the Olympics in 2004 and the World Championships in '05 & '07. Wariner rarely lost, and then only in meets that were off the radar and really didn't matter - about once a year. But something happened on his way to a defense of his Olympic title last year - a worthy opponent stepped up his game, Lashawn Merritt.
~~~~~~~~ Till we laugh again~~~~~~~
I read this Herman cartoon, laughed all over the place, but then my hands began to tremble. And my feet. And my arms and legs. Pretty soon all of me was trembling; I was having a nightmare, during the day, while I was fully awake—
This is a classic B movie, great special effects and terrible writing. Guy Pearce excels as Snow, with corny one liners and a hard ass persona. As typically seen in B movies, some of the strongest performances were found in the supporting cast. Lenny James is a standout as national security bureaucrat, Shaw. Vincent Regan, Alex lends credence to the argue, which I just made up, that all bad guys should be Scottish and Peter Stormare, Langral always shines a person who motivations one is never sure of.
I used a mix of products here, mostly leftover bits from Bo Bunny's Country Garden collection, and random flowers/stickers I had sitting around, many of them leftovers from old Artful Delight kits. I'm really happy with how this one turned out, unfortunately the weather is so dark and gloomy here that I had a really tough time photographing this layout, but you get the idea, anyway, right?
Here's the front entryway to Quarters D:
But when I asked what happened to Derek Boogaard, that has nothing to do with Thursday, Matt Carkner or a bad shoulder.
Having lived in different regions of the country and sojourned in different English-speaking countries, I've long had a keen ear for differences in accent and pronunciation as well as word choice and syntax. I used to make a game of trying to guess the origin of an English-speaking person, but now it will be harder to do so, if accents keep being replaced by ''mass media English''.
Most of all, goofing around and laughing together.
I feel that the public art in the subways is all too often overlooked, so I created an outfit inspired by one of the most beautiful stained glass installations at the Franklin Avenue subway station in Brooklyn. This is the first in what I hope to be a series of posts inspired by public art in the subways.
However it's the stuff he does inside which has made his eponymous place one of the most highly sought after places for a table. With a wait list of at least three months for Friday and Saturday nights, Vetri recently abandoned a la carte dining for tasting menu only. In a nutshell, his kitchen decides what each diner eats for each of the five savory, and one sweet course.
Also on today's curriculum: What's a weed (goddamn dock plants) and what's something we can eat (arugula); why only plants and not people go into the raised bed (soil compaction and killing plants); why it's a bad idea to pound on the metal parts of the lawn tractor with a hammer (dents leading to rust) but the rubber tires are okay; why it's best to pull up dandelion plants before the pretty yellow flowers turn into evil, fluffy seeds that try to take over the garden; why blackberry plants require caution (thorns, like the rose bush or a cactus) and on and on and on.
Happy birthday Margaret hope you liked your card, another Stamp Smith stamp of Sophie Loren. Backing paper from Do Crafts the rest from my stash
So if you can think of him and sing
Other: Basic rhinestones, dimensionals, Chocolate Chip Scallop Dots ribbon, Perfect Polka Dots embossing folder
All you need to do is sign up, (those already signed up are still welcome to enter) and then leave a comment here in this post, telling us why you like the magazine or something you would like to see us do.
I think about how we got here. We fought to get here, to this place of the new us. Not because we wanted to remake ourselves, but because we wanted to save ourselves. It was noble, and it still is, but these leftover pieces, they are hard to handle. There are sharp memories, and if I'm not careful I might cut myself. These boxes filled with mixed emotion, the rest of them will wait for another day. The boys and I repack the path that we made, pull down the door and lock it, for safe keeping.
Trinity Brewing Company Slap Your Mammy Double IPA
They sidle over to the garden,
-you absolutely adore Frank. He gets so many hugs and cuddles every day from you.
Proclaimed for sate significance Indonesian ( and pronounced kindred to the English ), Indonesia is the household of satay, and satay is a widely famous dish consequence almost all regions of Indonesia. Being a close, sundry variations own been developed throughout the Indonesian Archipelago
So, with any Thai cooking, the aim is quick cooking, so it’s fast and easy to prepare but filled with aromatic fragrance foods and delicious fresh herbs and veg. Packed with Vitamin C from the limes and other veggies, magnesium, calcium and fibre from your ton of corriander, great benefits for your skin and anti-viral properties with wonderful coconut milk, protein, Vitamin B’s and iron from your lean chicken and this broth includes gluten free ribbon noodles and a small cup of leftover thai jasmine rice but you don’t have to include rice..I was just using up leftovers…So here goes:
They still tasted amazing, I will be making these again, next time I will follow the recipe exactly and I will stick with one or the other; Gluten Free or Regular Baking...I am guessing the caving of my muffins had everything to do with the gluten free flour. Good thing my guinea pigs aren't picky ;) I'm not even sure why I have gluten free flour in the house...I think I may have been trying something out for my Mom because she has a wheat sensitivity and I always associate wheat with gluten. I think Iw ould like to try more gluten free baking but I need some solid recipes, I hate throwing things out. So if anyone knows a good blog or cookbook and could point me in the right direction, I would be ever so grateful.
"We have protested and in some cases they have said they will stop but in other cases they say it happens everywhere, like Abu Ghraib. If anything, the number of cases has been accelerating."
have gathered again after his death.
“If the order came from a higher level than the Jammu and Kashmir state government, an explanation must be provided,” Reporters Without Borders said. “It would be unacceptable if the federal government interfered – covertly and without giving any reasons – in the programming of the only privately-owned radio station broadcasting from Srinagar.”
I next saw him on the six o’clock news. His picture, and that of his wife, suddenly appeared, with the news that the “mentally-impaired” couple had been murdered. I sat there numb. He had written me some letters a couple of years earlier.
when I complain to you;
All things paper make me happy! I am a stamper and card maker with a passion for 3D paper crafts. Origami was my entire craft life until I discovered stamping in mid 2011. I love trying out new techniques and new tools.
Bayern Munich and Arsenal make up the top five in the rankings, with Chelsea and Liverpool ranked seventh and eighth respectively.
The DD Team
About a block further, as I'm walking, happy with my dear friends and thinking about my little apartment, a man turns the corner toward me. He's about my size, maybe a little taller, probably thinner than me. He looks to be in his late 40s or early 50s. He's just walking, coming my direction, on the same sidewalk I'm on. There are no cars near us, and the stoplights will soon start blinking off and on, as they did at 2am back then.
I've used one of Mo's images again and this little cutie is called 'Chickies' I also managed to find some papers in my stash that I thought went well with the image ( I know I'm a bit late for Easter LOL!)
Recently I have been rereading Ascii Dreams a blog by the creator of Unangband and I ended up thinking quite a bit about some of what I read. As it pertains to this post I was thinking on what I had read in This article which is part 6 of 9 on how Unangband's dungeon is generated. Particularly I was interested in the idea of complex dungeon features being achieved by simple self contained states. An example from the post is that there is regular Water which when hit by something that can hurt water causes it to transition to another state, the crest of a way. The crest in turn hurts all adjacent water tiles and transitions into a wave then next turn into rough water which does nothing except transition into Water. combining this all together and you get dynamic waves that don't need to store any kind of information past what they are. While not that realistic of a water system it does a good enough job without all the hassle of trying to figure out stuff like how to combine flows and water pressure.
12Him that overcometh will I make a pillar in the temple of my God, and he shall go no more out: and I will write upon him the name of my God, and the name of the city of my God, which is new Jerusalem, which cometh down out of heaven from my God: and I will write upon him my new name.
Ryan's prognosis is great though. We will continue to do everything we can for him and make sure he gets the best education he deserves.
my demons will be
Montewa remembered ‘Mama Busi Mhlongo’ as a warm loving woman who treated everyone she met as her own children.
Me: "Hmm?"
3:29).
“How did they find me here?” I asked.
Or did you shed that rotten small town skin
I often make envelops out of one sided pattern paper, which is what I did here. This pattern reminds me of the coffee beans which goes with the theme of the card.
She probably didn't imagine that she was going to be disturbed and perturbed
Lynne Hillier is a social psychologist and Principal Research Fellow at the Australian Research Centre in Sex Health & Society (ARCSHS) at La Trobe University. Her research over the last 17 years has focused on the marginalisation of young people, particularly same-sex attracted youth, and the ways that techniques of domination (such as homophobia) can lead to negative health outcomes.
ALL BUT A MIRAGE
Level 25: MP Cost: 60, Duration: 750 seconds, All Stats: +13%.
There, William meets his victim's mother-in-law, Mrs. Conroy, who accepts his roses but doesn't seem to have an opinion on what he did; when he apologizes for not going to the funeral, she tells him that he hadn't been expected to come.
On top of all this, the Army is now organizing a criminal investigation against the soldiers in the pictures, obviously to gain political favor with the current administration. I wonder how many of the warriors whom are going to be prosecuted have been decorated for valor under arms?
After a month and a half of anxious bumming around, I’m so excited to be part of the Fab.com food team! Thanks to all my friends who were so incredibly supportive and encouraged me to keep trying when I thought about giving up after several good, but fruitless interviews.
There were several highlights but I want to mention two that were particularly interesting. Jesper Larsson talked about how he had redefined the concept of accommodation when being away from home. He has, together with sponsors and colleagues, started something that he refers to as a creator's-inn. Basically this is a way of providing free accommodation for artists when they perform their creative work away from their home city. Jesper and his crew have, among a number of examples he presented, built hotel rooms that should feel like "home". In these rooms there are clothes in the drawers for those who wishes to use them, music records to listen to, a wallpaper with a city map where visitors can recommend good restaurants to each other using post-its and even an online directory with suggested people to hang out with. These things are all possible through the collaborative effort of a number of altruistic soles that likes helping others. The beauty of this is that creates a "win-win-win-win situation" since the idea benefits creators (staying for free), local creative organizers (can offer guests accommodation), culture of the city (makes the city attractive to go to for creators), creative exchanges (more creators may be able to travel and perform at other places) and sponsors (e.g. IKEA that seemed to have contributed with some of the furniture).
Dear ugly green jacket guys,
Here’s the issue though. I want to do it all the time. I want it to be my livelihood. I want to be in the position where my expenses are covered, I can feed my family on what I earn from my ministry, so that I can devote my whole life to developing and creating and sharing this gift without having to worry about whether or not I can get a day off from my day job or running out of vacation days, not to mention having to stop in the middle of a creative burst to leave my studio and go to a “day job.”
P.S.: I’ve added an excerpt of my current novel in the “Stuff I’m Working On” page, feel free to check it out and see if you actually like my stuff. It will probably need to be edited, maybe even rewritten. I might even delete it, but I thought I’d share a little so you can see if you even like my writing. If you do, AWESOME, tell your friends, tell me. If you don’t, well, keep it to yourself; I don’t have thick enough skin yet for criticism. =)
4 smiled
76. If a sole (a type of fish) lays upon a chessboard it can change the colouring of its body to match the pattern of the chess board. The sole takes about 4 minutes to make the change.
AND SCARY FANCY ACCESSORIES!!!!
IMHO if you go into the military or not if you are a American on the day you become of legal age (or the day you are handed a green card) you should take a public oath to defend the Constitution against all enemies foreign and domestic.
How was everyone's 1st of May? Traditionally the partying happens on May Day's Eve and on the 1st people have a picnic, but I was so tired from the day before I just went straight back home.
5. Then it was just a matter of flattening the image, adding a little Unsharp Mask and saving!! Easy isn't it ??
Anyway, this is fairly irrelevant since Backstage has been out for a while now. What is relevant is that the developer, Max McGee (who currently has one of his games, Iron Gaia, featured at the moment) has re-started work on the sequel, Backstage II, after a long hiatus. I couldn't be more excited! Sporting a new menu-system coded by Archeia_Nessiah, a vastly improved battle-system compared to the original and a set of graphics and maps that actually look like they belong in a survival-horror game, all Backstage II really needs to do to ensure its success is to replicate the terrific storyline that the first game featured. Here's hoping I'm not dissapointed if (when?) this game is finally released!
I've signed up for fitness classes and not finished. (In my defense, I have a weak back, and I seem to always hurt it when I exercise. I know. Excuses, Excuses. Wah, Wah, Wah!) I've bought fitness videos and used them for a while religiously... A WHILE. I bought the Ab Cruncher and used it faithfully... for A WHILE. My most successful exercise experience was the Water Aerobics class I took years ago. Those old ladies and I rocked it out!
Of paramount importance is that people keep things in perspective. It is a fucking television program. In the scheme of American history, the Occupy Wall Street movement — and to call it a “movement” would be generous were it not for the fact that my bowels have movements — will carry greater cultural significance than any TV show could ever hope to impart. Perhaps people could just settle the fuck down a bit and quit acting like Hollywood nepotism is a harbinger of a burgeoning totalitarian plutocracy or that the casting agents fended off auditioning actors of color with fire hoses and German shepherds. Chill. The. Fuck. Out.
The scene shifts to the day of Barry and Iris' wedding. Iris has planned things so that even her perennially late boyfriend will arrive on time; she has told him the nuptials take place an hour before the actual scheduled time. But as Barry is walking to the church he spots a super-speed turtle (no, I am not kidding):
Latest news, latest urdu news, world news, current affairs, breaking news, arab country news, sport news, cricket news, daily news, Islamic news, india news, Pakistan news, india Pakistan news, current news,
-Preheat the oven to 400 degrees.
Email amy@amymerrick.com to place an order.
Mind you , l think l have cut enough tumblers for about 6 quilts!!!
Josiah – Procession
The first project I have to show you uses the You're My Type - Upper along with the Nested Pennant Dies and Grand Labels One Nestabilities. I created a framed name pennant for my son, Isaac. I used papers from the Lil Man Collection by Cosmo Cricket. I started by punching circles out of Choice Buttercream cardstock and stamping the letters in Isaac's name. Next I die cut the little banners using one of the small dies in the Nested Pennant set and attached the letters to each banner with foam adhesive.
In males, the same basic gonadal tissue and other related structures differentiate and migrate, but now form the testes that descend into scrotal sacs, interconnected with the vas deferens, related glands, and a urethra encased in a penis. Like an orchestra playing one of Beethoven’s great symphonies, numerous genes, hormones, myriads of cells and tissues, all need to come together in the proper amount, sequence and timing, or the outcome may leave much to be desired, or at least, contemplated. The wonder is not that it sometimes does not emerge in reproductively fertile form; the true marvel is that it usually does.
Find out how to zombify your photos here:
I don’t know whether I’ll regret or cherish my inaction, but off course inaction or pursuit of inaction are as tough as, or even tougher than, the action many of the times.
I haven't been to the mountains for many years -- it's so close and yet so far. But I do get to enjoy seeing them most mornings. Sometimes they are better viewed from a distance!
I'm pretty sure there is no overcoming this assumption. Fifty the new thirty? Not in their eyes. In their eyes my eyes have bags under them.
1009 D-II/23/1988. “The Baconian Revolution and Liberal Education.” Workshop on Woman Authors and the Politics of Liberal Education, Wake Forest University, Winston-Salem, North Carolina.
THEOPHYL. But by His question He exposes their folly. For while God blessed the sabbath, they forbade to do good on the sabbath; but the day which does not admit the works of the good is accursed.
“I was his little girl,” Durham said. She said her father’s death had denied him an opportunity to walk her down the aisle at her wedding and get to know his grandchildren.
spend three seasons
Me: We've known each other how long and yet you live?
"Everyone thinks you killed her, defend yourself."
Of course Potshot and I are already playing another game, EverQuest, but neither of us thought that would be quite the thing for the group. The progression servers would be too slow for a group with a play budget of 3 hours a week. The standard servers have potential, but EverQuest is quirky and, no matter how much you love it, it does feel its age. Getting the group to go for that seemed unlikely.
I spoke to the GI on the phone yesterday morning and we decided to wean off the Baclofen that was started to help with Emily's retching. I told her that we hadn't noticed a difference. Then my husband reminds me that Emily didn't wake up retching yesterday morning. She just woke up. It was such a NORMAL thing, that it didn't strike me as to how abnormal for her that was! This morning, no retching.
The cards featured some of the bigger names of the day, except unfortunately, Nolan Ryan. The players uniform number is featured inside a baseball, and all MLB logos have been airbrushed out.
Country Grunge Effect:
The ladies love this class and just love stamping extras on their envelopes. I highly recommend anyone wanting to do classes to offer your customers the matching envelopes.
Nevertheless, if you are still unsure if you really need on in your home, then this article could help you evaluate and determine whether you should need a home water filtration system or not.
This is the second beer from my parents that we tried. I had never heard of the Weyerbacher Brewing Co. from Easton, Pennsylvania and was excited to try this beer.
Tor Johnson waddles through many scenes and stands in place in many more as effectively in pre-zombie mode as he does post-zombie. If you consider the only difference in his performance is the addition of white contact lenses and a scar that moves around his face willy-nilly, that makes the argument that wrestlers are only as good as their costuming.
Being a literature person, a story person, OF COURSE I have been thinking about the symbolic richness of this image. What message is available to me, having witnessed this event? Is it: Don't let the semester swallow you up? or perhaps: Don't bite off more than you can chew? Hmmm...
Pro Color is a new movement that promotes the use of more colour in every day life, because "... a colourful, pleasant and positive society begins simply with more colours". As they state in in their manifest, they want to put on the agenda those issues that are generally overlooked by politicians and they do this by bringing them to the public's attention with beautiful colours. An example?
But also note the context. This speech is not designed to teach the soldiers anything new or profound. They have been training for years, learning the art of combat at home or in training camps. They aren’t getting a lesson in lancing today. Today they fight.
This part is tricky with chicken breast meat. What you want to do is cook it with a little vegetable oil at medium heat until just when you stop seeing any pink. This will mean the meat is almost done, but not quite. Remove it from heat and let it sit. It will be the last thing to go into the chili, just before it is done. It should now look something like this
No directions to lead me to you
Today it is warmer here than in Florence, Italy.
JUSTIN: So Tanna Frederick is on contract with you at Rainbow Films? Why the decision for a contract?
Now to knuckle down and make that happen.
It such a great way to give back to military mommies right!
I am a little uneasy about how much meat we will have to eat... it seems selfish and unsustainable (as in the world's resources probably couldn't handle it if we all ate this way)... and right now I can't afford (or rather, I choose not to afford) to purchase all this additional meat locally from humanely raised animals. I figure I am going to have to buy 7 (!) times more meat than currently. BUT, there will be things I am NOT buying that will hopefully help offset that cost. I plan to definitely continue with what meat we already purchase locally, perhaps increase the amount a bit, and buy the rest from the regular grocery store.
And I'm not sure how I feel about any of it.
Eve Arden Stage Door
“Oh my god johnny depp just got on stage with Alice cooper wtf omg I love this right now I’m speechless!!!!!”
Start by mixing 1 1/2 parts of clear embossing powder with 1 part sugar free Jello. Be sure to use sugar free or the sugar will burn when you heat it. I used a teaspoon and a half teaspoon from my measuring spoon set and mixed 1 1/2 tsp of EP with 1 tsp jello....I am playing with lime and strawberry today!
Our guide told us it had cost just over a million dollars to build this dredge and as we thought about the value of a dollar in 1912, we realized Dredge No. 4 was quite an investment. The guide went on to tell us that the dredge paid for herself in only one year, so it seems the investors behind the gold mining operations had made a good decision.
"Starting Today"
3. I detest making the bed. It's just one of those things.
I want you to have a lot of questions answered up front, so you can have no doubt.
According to Ozymandias, Bill Foxton had won an award from the SAS:
of massachusetts, please
We have some of the most amazing ideals in history. Our national heroes said things like “Ask what you can do for your country”, “I cannot tell a lie”, “Every man must decide whether he will walk in the light of creative altruism or in the darkness of destructive selfishness”. Most of our nation wants to live like that. I’m ready for our country to start living up to those ideals, instead of making selfishness the goal and altruism seem like softness. Altruism takes strength, more strength than the crafty maneuvering that keeps the powerful empowered. I’m ready for more than big business’ status quo. Maybe the protesters are too.
Aspie instinct 5.6 Average
Democrats are so quick to qualify any comments they make about politics, by stating that both Democrats and Republicans are to blame for the ineffectiveness of government, and especially of Congress. While I think it’s important to recognize how poisonous money to both Democrats and Republicans has been to our political process, when we’re looking at actual legislating, it’s naïve or just completely disingenuous not to recognize that Republicans are holding up the process.
“The government is being high handed in denying the people the changes we want. We demand free and fair elections,” said Zainuddin Tahar, 54, a pensioner from central Malaysia, who wore a yellow shirt.
And now it is Claudia Rankine:
Other: 6 votes (26%)
Photos of the fugitive al-Qaeda leader were found recently at the home of a gang member during a criminal investigation.
Heather Hurlburt replied that there was no arena where politics and advocacy were off limits any more. To be “purist” about how to use local governmental structures was to “tie one of our hands behind our backs.” She added that “elected officials respect things that other elected officials choose to do.” Shahid Buttar noted that “it’s absolutely proper for this community to raise its voice; I would say it’s almost improper not to… Local governments have a role to play on national questions. … The idea of just turning a blind eye because the decision is supposed to be made somewhere else, I think that’s a very passive way to treat your own rights.”
I am weird. I think I was born that way.
A Most Improper Magick ~ a tall tales & short stories review
Patrick Duffy, Cardiff Airport’s Managing Director adds: “We’re pleased with Vueling’s announcement to operate a further two routes to Alicante and Palma, in addition to the previously announced service to Barcelona. The Spanish low cost carrier will be a welcome addition to South Wales, and will offer our passengers the chance to access some of Europe’s leading holiday destinations from their local airport. In addition the airline, which has a very high profile in Spain, will also give Spanish passengers the opportunity to visit Wales. We look forward to the start of the airline’s operations from Cardiff from the end of March, and trust the Welsh consumers will support these services.”
I did not.
Notes: Take no more than 5 attempts. Warm up quickly as well. This entire event should take no more than 15 minutes.
currently I have 14 windows open on my browser of homes in socal.
This is the story behind the most interesting man in the world...
I have been seeing an acu for a few weeks who I found online- £40 an hour. Seemed to be going ok.
As soon as I started writing for children, I started putting dogs into the story. It was a chance to revisit an important part of my childhood. I grew up with dogs and I have not been able to keep pets in adult life. But I still have a strong affinity with dogs and cannot pass one without having a conversation and a pat.
Nonetheless, here is some insight to what the word Purgatory technically means:
Pamuk is the man of the back streets, where, he believes, one can feel the melancholic pulse of a city. Not surprisingly, he bought the building that houses his museum in a small street of the then still poor district of Çukurcuma. Through gentrification the neighborhood has drastically changed. Inside, Pamuk wanted to cling to the atmosphere of bygone days. Yet, it is fiction.
Later in the 1960s, Dumaresq met Galt MacDermot and embarked on a writing collaboration that would dominate his output for years to come. Gerwing recalls, “At a Canadian party after the success of Hair, Galt complained that he didn't have a decent lyricist. Bill, as a joke, started reciting his nonsense verse, and Galt was delighted. Galt said ‘we should do a musical together.” Dumaresq teamed up with MacDermot, writing the libretto for MacDermot's music in the stage musical Isabel's a Jezebel, which opened at the Duchess Theatre, London in 1970, and The Human Comedy (based on an unused William Saroyan screenplay), which opened off-Broadway in 1983. But from the point of view of cinema history the most significant development in Dumaresq's career had taken place earlier, in 1963, through a chance meeting with another fellow Canadian...
True or not true, we do not know. But the stories are traded everyday at warongs and lounges.
This is why I want to transfer back to my hometown. So that I can enjoy healthy food prepared by my mum instead of shoving all those unhealthy food into my mouth just because I'm too lazy to cook and restaurant is too far wtf.
"I miss Merrell."
I found this in grandma's fruit cellar the same day I found my special shoe box.
And my baby is in kindergarten. She enjoys riding the bus and loves her school and friends.
The next day, Helen and Bernadette decide to check out Candyman's old stomping ground, a slum called Cabrini Green. Bernadette tries to convince Helen that Cabrini Green is much too dangerous to visit, but Helen insists on going there, to prove that she isn't afraid to do what it takes to complete her paper.
“Uh, Jesphan.”
# of pages: 381
You would certainly think so. For many seasons now it has been obvious to most that the disciplinary system that is currently in place does not work, often punishing those who are undeserving or allowing those who should be reprimanded to escape any action taken against them.
Need a place to keep all your favorite magazines? Turn an old cereal box into a magazine holder by cutting from the lid down on a diagonal until all you have is the bottom of the box and sides. Cover with contact paper to suit your décor and you’ve not only saved the landfill from one more cereal box but you’ve saved your pocketbook some money as well.
I've tried to use a variety of different paint effects on each of the mini canvases as well as use a few different products to make a texture sampler.
*getting off at 5 on Friday afternoons
5)The people finally emerge successful in throwing us out of the line.
Christmas is a perfect time for all bakes and cakes hit the most of all.Kerala Plum cake is one recipe is which I always miss after coming to US.I always had my mom's version of cake and liked it the most .But far away from parents and now as a parent ,I felt the necessity of baking this cake now.It was a real sweet one to impress everyone at home to bring back the memories of Kerala.This recipe is the true version of mom 's recipe and the aroma of the cake spreads throughout the room by the time we finish baking the cake.I prefer this cake the most to all other cake recipes even icing ones and friends,it really tastes great !!
I split this batch into two fermenters. I pitched Safale S04 dry yeast into one half. Into the other half I pitched some WYeast 1968 London ESB slurry I had saved from a previous batch. The S04 half took off right away. I don't know what happened, but after three days the London ESB half showed no activity, so I pitched a packet of Munton and Fison dry yeast. Then it took off within a few hours. I thought this part of the batch was going to suffer from the lengthy lag time before fermentation started, but it turned out that this was the award-winning beer. I really think that the WYeast 1968 did contribute to the final flavor and I think it's the right yeast for this recipe.
And speak honestly,
There's nothing wrong with the video, but the thing is, when I shoot one of these, I use the transfer, compression and upload time to write down some thoughts that the beer evokes. But for some reason, this little snippet got stuck on my camera, and wouldn't download from the camera. So rather than note down a few Wilde-esque witticisms about the beer, I spent a couple of hours swearing and fiddling with setting on the camera and the computer.
Self-effacing yet self-accepting,
2 tbsp. cocoa
I first heard of The Pilot's Wife years ago when I bought multiple copies of one of Shreve's other books, The Last Time They Met, for my old book club (a book I selected because it was cheap, and because the bookstore had enough copies for everyone. Plus it had a nicely-colored cover, and the synopsis sounded decent). The dust jacket said "by the author of The Pilot's Wife" across the top. I'd never heard of The Pilot's Wife, but I felt like I should have. So, years later when I found a used copy for 75¢, I figured I would give it a try.
It is forbidden to name a child with a name that denote servitude to other than Allah, for example Abd an-Nabi, Abd ar-Rasul etc, just as it is forbidden to name them with names that are particular to the Unbelievers like George, Michael, Susan etc.
5) There’s a half loaf of crusty French bread on the counter. I should make bread pudding.
First - thank you so much to those who are the master-minds behind the challenge - you are all amazing!
In the study, Kit finds a picture of 2 children who seem to be twins. Muffy enters the room quietly, and creeps her out with a thousand-yard stare. As Kit discreetly returns the photo to its place on the table, Muffy tells her that people seem to get lost at sea on a pretty regular basis. After that, there's a brief moment where we see Hal removing a gun from his luggage. Hmmm....
I'm not sure if my Laura Geller Spackle melted a bit in transit, but it's much thinner than I thought it would be. I've heard people say this is like a thicker silicone primer, but mine's really thin! (Would putting it in the fridge do anything, or just be really stupid?) It appears to have shimmer in my swatch, but I didn't notice that I had a sparkly face when I used this.
Again, start with character. Why are they after the object? Who are they? What are their thoughts and feelings? What if they're not white, black-suited dudes at all - but a gang of good-looking teenage Asian martial artists. Or a trio of middle-aged women with snaky hair and long fingernails. Or silent people dressed as stormtroopers. What motivates them and just how far will they go?
Next is "Montezuma's Monster" by Tony Williamsune (art) and Don Glut (story). A trio of men head to Mexico to search for Montezuma's treasure. They eventually find it in a cave where they also find some mummified corpses and a drawing of Quetzalcoatl, a flying serprent that is said can turn any winged thing into itself. The men take the treasure and start heading back to the U.S. Along the way a buzzard turns into Quetzalcoatl and kills one of the men. The other men try to kill any bird they find along the way to prevent it from happening again. One of them plots to kill the other, but is killed by Quetzalcoatl, who had transformed from a mosquito, at the last second. The final man gets back to civilization and thinks he's made it back safely at the airport, but the airplane turns into Quetzalcoatl and kills him.
Our latest Explore section on the Wellcome Collection website is devoted to a selection of the Wellcome Library’s collection of AIDS posters. These posters, produced during the 1980s and 1990s, show evidence of the enormous and diverse public health campaigns created in response to the AIDS epidemic. In the days before twitter and facebook (and, some would say, even now) the quickest way to alert someone to the dangers of HIV was through an eye-catching, attention-grabbing poster in their place of work or play.
He warned that more than 70% of any of these kidnapping-dramas are moreover, never reported to the authorities. Thom said when people find themselves in kidnapping-situaitons, they should always try and obtain advice from the people wh are trained in such matters. “They must work with people who know the mind-sets of kidnappers,’ he warned. Guardrisk Allied Products & Services has a network of experts to help their clients who take out a Kidnapping Policy . http://www.sake24.com/JouGeldsake/Al-hoel-meer-rykes-sakelui-word-ontvoer-20100507
Two seemingly simple tasks while the boys run around playing. Within seconds, the timer is announcing that the nebs need to be taken out of the scalding bath, the dog is losing her mind barking at her nemesis (the UPS guy), Michael has an accident, and TINK!, I hear a loud, indiscernible noise. But my gut tells me that this is not good.
On the day that Fletcher Christian ledThe Mutiny On The Bounty, Arsenal travel to the Potteries with The Britannia Stadium witnessing some of the club’s most horrible away performances against a meritless style of football. The parallels are not lost; Bligh’s unnecessary bullying and overly aggressive approach manifested in football terms by Pullis’ artless and brutal long ball philosophy. Arguments will rage about whether the rules are stretched, misshapen or just plain ignored; there is little argument that the Welshman is out-of-touch with modern footballing theory and it is almost inconceivable that under his current theories that they will progress. If the supporters of that club are happy with that, so be it; mediocrity rules indeed in the midlands that time forgot.
Share on OVI
Rara Avis
Botan (sticky) rice or basmati rice, cooked per package directions.
The initiative also needs more volunteers, because that’s how we’re going to win this battle. The biotech industry may outdo us in funding ability, but we as consumers still outnumber them. Pamm Larry, the California grandmother who started this initiative, is correct when she says we need to reach every single California community—large and small.
Total Carbohydrate 2.9 g
I haven't decided if I'll participate this year by entering anything, in fact I haven't even read the new rules and changes for this year, but if memory serves me correctly entries start being accepted this month!
6) Language of Love
Grandma B wonders
Plan for eight further discussion posts
I can't believe how fast this year has flown by. We are almost to THE END! My little ones are getting anxious. How about yours?
We'll see you back here tomorrow with one of my projects!
Tonight i'm going out to celebrate the birthday of the always beautiful Priscilla. I'm starting the night off right by deep conditioning my hair, painting my nails, shaving my legs.... you know, the works.
Lovely long top, leggings, Aladdin style trousers, a skirt and some comfy Italian leather shoes later we were over budget yet who cares? One happy special sister all kitted out in her new clothes was tired and ready to head home. We went via our elder sister’s house for some jelly and cream for a break from the ride in the car (which can be tiring in itself). Dropping me off at home and Debs seeing her niece and nephew before Jane took her back to our parents for a fashion show.
Securimage suggests that the captcha validation should occur after the standard form validation (required fields, content, etc). I whole-heartedly agree. The User would enter the captcha like this:
My Business – The Pharmacy
Harper's was confident this mode of transport was on its way, citing the use of 'continuous trains' at the Chicago and Paris Expositions and the fervent support by prominent New York businessmen. No less than New York's bridge commissioner Gustav Lindenthal briefly promoted the plan.
We, the undersigned, demand that Best Buy end its support for CAIR.
in philosophy at Cornell.
But Pac (and a rabbit we'd brought with us) were the only animals. I was very pregnant, and we didn't know anyone. I remember feeling extremely isolated that first winter, and almost bored. Hard to imagine now considering how crazy our schedules have become. Sometimes, I long for those quiet times from the first winter again.
Lady Gaga confirmed via Twitter she'll be at the Thierry Mugler Paris fashion show.
The first glitter I went for is Starry Meteor (130) which has iridescent micro glitter, small, round, holographic green pieces and silver bar glitter in a sheer green base. While the base does have a bit of tint, you have to layer this, as you would never build to anything opaque enough to fully cover.
corn muffins
It does bother me, however, when the Supreme Court rules in favor of those on death row that they may pursue lawsuits claiming that the lethal injections used by states are cruel and unusual. Nearly every state in the country has adopted lethal injections as the preferred method of execution, because of the belief that it is more humane and painless than the electric chair, the gas chamber or hanging. We have already gone the extra mile to make capital punishment as humane as possible. With this ruling, it will become virtually impossible for any state to execute anyone, overturning the will of most Americans and most legislatures. That might be tolerable for some other reason, but it’s absurd to argue that society has no right to inflict pain on murderers, and that is the essence of this ruling.
‘I don’t know whether the exercises helped or if the baby would have turned anyway. (She was very active all along.) But it certainly made me feel less anxious and less helpless to have something positive to do.’
Bon Voyage!!!
The resurrection of Jesus is a radically new idea within Judaism. For the most part, no one was expecting the messiah to die, let alone rise from the dead. As such, Wright sees the resurrection as one of the central clues for understanding Paul. For Paul, God revealed himself through Jesus, but Jesus was not simply a teacher, but “Christ Crucified.” While Paul remained a monotheist after his conversion, Wright says it was a “disturbingly redefined monotheism (6), with implications which sake the foundations of the worldview of the Second Temple period.
Perhaps you’ve heard the old saying about diet: “Mornings are gold, lunch is bronze, and dinner is lead.” Well, the same applies to personal energy levels. A few months ago, a lay leader handed me a newspaper article outlining the body’s daily rhythms. It underscored how, for most people, mornings provide peak energy and concentration. Quick recall and analytical reasoning are strongest in the a.m.
lean left, push off, grunt, rise, stand, and low into the sway
Bush made the announcement about the deal with the Canadian government and the CIAA in a short statement, in which he said the Cayman government had formed a strategic alliance with the Canadian Commercial Corporation, whose primary role, he said, was to “facilitate trade with other nations through the provision of commercial solutions.”
For the last two years, Jenny has been an amazing mentor and editor. Her first revisions, though VERY kind and 100% accurate, hurt. We cut over half of the material and did a major rewrite. But she saw my strengths and my potential. Her advice helped me find my voice. She encouraged me to focus on my strengths and to throw away what was subpar. She helped me shape my manuscript into a book that we both love.
That’s when it happened. 2 hours into the drive I realized I loaded everyone’s bags but my own. My bag with all my clothes, toiletries, and sleeping bag were in the back seat of my car back at the church.
Until recently I thought this was called "Tommy in seven Minutes," but I guess the real name is "D.U.M.B. rock Vol. 5," Live and learn I guess.
This post was partially inspired by recent encounters on Facebook and partially by Louis Foulkes, one of my new favorite vloggers. Here’s a video in which he talks about similarly annoying things in the social networking world:
Acts 16: 30-33
However, there’s an even bigger reason for addressing immigration. You thought you’d heard it all. Wait for it.
Four men turn to look at her. Two of them are sitting on her loungers and another two have their lunches laid out on the patio table. They have lighted two of the citronella candles she's left on the table. The men all smile at her.
Steve’s List
2 years later I still feel raw, burned. I hate the looks of couples at the parks with children when they see my ringless finger and 2 young kids in tow. You know the wife is thinking, “Thank GOD, I’m not her.” I only know that thought because I’ve thought it before. They look at me with these sad eyes and it’s super awkward. Sometimes I just want to snap at the couple “Yea, this sucks so you better quit fighting about his dirty socks not making it to the hamper or you could end up like this!” I watch couples waste their lives as I lay in bed at night and BEG God or whoever to not make me do this alone anymore. Going to the grocery store is like leading an elephant in a china store. Talk about dirty looks! Both of your kids are screaming their heads off because you just picked them up from daycare and they are hungry. You only brought them with because you work all the damn time and there isn’t a morsel left for them to eat at the house. I’ve almost slapped a ho at the grocery store for a dirty look. You rich little bitch, you have NO idea what this is like. So go get in your Audi and try to be grateful for what you have- for it can be gone in a second.
In a brilliant disguise
color: liver/white
Open your heart to that person, and release unnecessary suffering from the past.
“Oh I don’t have a word ticket.”
He was not heard from again until 1964 when Dick Waterman (who became his manager), Nick Pearls ( a collector who would go on to found Yazoo Records) and Phil Spiro found him living in Rochester, N.Y., this "rediscovery" happening after they had searched the Delta looking for clues.
During a lovely long summer about 10 years ago a bunch of guys formed a bunch of new friendships. And out of those friendships came 10 minutes of film. 10 weekends of hard work, 10 weekends of joy.
I've created several new items that will work their way into my shop over this weekend. Some of them are already in my Etsy shop. But a couple are being introduced here for the first time. If you see one you like, email or convo and I'll set up a reserved order for you.
I want for a walk/jog with Day 2 of the C25K program. My time was slower than the fist day, but at least I got out there – this is also after doing yoga yesterday. I am aiming to get some exercise in five days this week – three days walk/jog, two days yoga.
It looked like this inside. A giant love seat. Or a portable harem. Or it's where I Dream Of Jeannie was filmed. That little towel was there because the bottom cushion was stained and soaking wet. Very appealing. There was something strange about this thing. It had a presence of its own. You could not be on that porch and ignore it. It's like the gaping mouth of a whale or Pacman just before they swallow you whole. Once we opened up the mouth of death (and couldn't put the cover back on), we could not go out on that porch again.
dj: "oh ok. but Mu$hui told me that you take pictures when you don't like the music."
We waited all night together, she and I.
I love the idea of the Asian jars and cherry blossoms, especially for my foyer area. I love the drama of the height which would be an exciting introduction to my home. Now, I just have to figure out where to buy cherry blossoms.
Celeb Tweets
There is nothing better for a man, than that he should eat and drink, and that he should make his soul enjoy good in his labour. This also I saw, that it was from the hand of God.
The firehouse at Bodie was especially gratifying because it still had some hose carriages and jumpers inside, plus a row of hanging coal oil lamps. Here are a few more pictures of this amazing ghost town of the gold-fevered West.
I inserted this photo and then realized I have those shoes!! Total coincidence, I swear! Anyways, I knew I would get sidetracked into other non-home topics. To be fair, I did warn you.
Yes! They (the Muslims) used to be afraid: (1) of their sins and (2) from the disobedience of Allah (swt), more than they used to be afraid of their enemy or their enemy’s great number and mighty weapons, as we find ‘Umar bin AlKhattab (raa) saying: (in his letter to the Commander S’ad bin Abi Waqqas, when he sent him for the conquest of Persia):
24. I broke my arm once. Well, my friend Angela broke my arm playing soccer. It wasn't any fun!! I am thinking if I would have went to that skating party tonight, I could have broken it again. Man it's been a long time!
Pixies Monkey gone to heaven US
I am not ashamed of the fact that I'm gay. I'm just not too comfortable saying it out loud or letting everybody know unless for some reason this would be something that would affect our relationship, which should never. But hey, look at where we're at. The country just recently legalized same-sex unions, we've all been going through this deep integration to society. Even though we've always been a part of it, the delusional minority and the ass-licking majority of the labor party have always seen the country with more people disagreeing to same-sex marriage.
And last, but certainly not least…
I made 4 pint jars for around $6 TOTAL.
Anisha is the sweetest one in our family! She has braces from age of 4 to correct her underbite problem. She is amazing with it...never complains about all discomforts of these braces, always cooperates with the Orthodontists (they love her) .........very happy child!!! She made this painful treatment very easy for all of us!!
On the back of the P.C. Richard store, I saw the notices in the photo at left. "No! You can't urinate here!" one message said sternly. The others, in English, Spanish, and French, were more polite: "Please don't urinate here.!"
The decor chez Quai Quai depends where you are seated. The restaurant straddles a block, meaning it has two entrances and two distinct dining rooms. One is all romantic-intimatey with muted lighting and cushioned bench seats and a tasteful brown and lime-green interior design motif. The other is more canteen-esque, with simple, mismatched furniture, distressed wooden doors and more muted lighting. We were seated in the rambunctious part of the restaurant (even before we had opened our mouths..) and settled in for a three-course adventure.
Well hello everyone! I cannot believe that it has taken me this long to make my first post on this beautiful blog. I would like to say a special thank you to Melissa for all her great posts… she truly has the gift of written expression.
~quote from the book “Shift Happens” by Jewel Diamond Taylor
One July afternoon while we were out for a smoke on the steps, Kevin pointed out a mural of Harvey Milk I hadn’t noticed before, though it was directly across the street from our office. The portrait (by Josef Norris, 1998) is partially shadowed by a luscious tree. It is as though Harvey is looking down on the shop, bemused, checking in on business. The mural also includes Milk’s message, You’ve gotta give ‘em hope! “That was Harvey’s camera shop right down there,” Kevin told me, pointing to the storefront below. Less than a week later I finished reading the biography of Harvey Milk in tears on the 22.
A 20 year-old young woman told me how she and her cousin go on. “We were so drunk,” she said beaming, “...we couldn’t stand.” They could not remember how they got home. I asked if they like getting drunk. “It’s social” one replied; the other, ”It’s good fun.” “It is acceptable now like sex and dress.”
Mass Anti-Austerity Protests Sweep Through Spain. Staff, RT News: “At least 100,000 protesters angered by the country’s grim economic prospects turned out for street demonstrations in 80 cities across Spain. In the capital Madrid, thousands of protesters chanted and beat drums as they marched from different directions to converge on the central Puerta del Sol Square. Marches were also held in Barcelona, Bilbao, Malaga and Seville. The four day-long demonstration marks the one-year anniversary of the ‘Indignants’ protest movement, as Spain’s economic woes deepen by the day”: here.
Next, I prompted him further, taking him back through the mists of time to the fateful incident a few hours ago. “When did you last speak to your slave?”
You see, her daughter had just started Kindergarten this year, and she was with her Mom shopping for her teacher for Christmas. I explained to her that it would be a great box for her teacher to hold her school supplies in, and she loved that idea, plus this box (I think) would be a great teacher's gift. It's pretty fun knowing that this box will be in a classroom with young children just starting out in school--a good home for it!
Hello to our great fans and followers! Here it is another great anything goes challenge for you! Our last challenge of the month of March. Time just seems to be flying by. How many projects have you made already this year??
So the lyrics below are still true. I still don’t have air, and I am left out in the deep.
Vallone and others were successful, and the city updated zoning rules to prevent future out-of-context construction in the area.
The looming "Carmageddon" in Los Angeles made the front page of today's Wall St. Journal, as residents there brace for the two-plus day closure of ten miles of the famed San Diego Freeway (I-405) this weekend. The disruption is apparently required to allow for some demolition necessary for the construction of new high-occupancy vehicle (HOV) lanes on the 405. As locals assess their alternate routes--there are many--they might also want to spend some time thinking about who will be allowed to drive in those new HOV lanes. California recently decided to deny ordinary (non-plug-in) hybrid cars that privilege, in preference to plug-ins and other alternatively fueled vehicles. The new policy and the one it replaces both reflect muddled thinking, but I would argue that abandoning hybrids at this juncture is a mistake, at least if saving gas is still a priority in the Golden State.
These are all things that are priceless in life and cannot be purchased from anywhere. Instead it is something you can do that requires no special talent, it can be freely obtained in a simple enjoyable way, anytime you want and all by yourself.
In the same manner African Americans marched for Trayvon Martin, the time has come to march against homicide, HIV/AIDS, and having children out of wedlock.
Caller: Five.
I earned that title CNA...through hard work and dedication. I have a little piece of paper that says so.
♥ 1/3 cup butter
She loved it (and still loves baths). We have a LOT of pictures of her getting her bath. Like 429. Almost. But it was freaking adorable.
“When I arrived at Wheeler I got off the stage and instantly noticed the massive police presence. The police presence consisted of DHS, metro police, HPD, TSA, and Harris county police officers. They were going on to buses searching and stopping people for questions. Apparently Sheila Jackson Lee was there pushing for more security like what I was viewing. I asked the TSA agent if there was gonna be a bigger presence of metro or TSA. He said both,” Levine said in an email.
There is a new on-line scrapbook store for you to shop!
I didn't think so.
WHAT IS STRESS?
Why stall the wing?
Pour over melted butter and whisk until blended.
last event is dong dong chiang
The 5-year old niece has a brand new little brother so we also made a little red monster for the baby. There was some discussion about whether this is a dinosaur or a monster. I think he's a monster. Regardless, he has awesome green spikes.
“You don’t have to be sarcastic. I know I’ve been so crumbly all the way.”
To lighten moods we hit the town. Each bar has a country band jamming. One band was quite interactive with our group & let me request a song. I requested Usher. He didn’t know any Usher so played me a banjo version of an Enrique Inglaisis song instead. Very cool!
So there you have some ways. My next blog will be posting insha’Allah today, with other ways to mention Allah’s name and when to say them such as Alhamdulilah (Thanks God), Astaughfirallah (Allah forgive me) for sins, etc.
We can celebrate a child having fun in public (as long as he isn't hurting anyone or anything), and the parents who allow him to do so. We can offer a smile to a family in crisis, rather than a scowl fed by homicidal thoughts (LZG: we want to kill you for letting your brat ruin our dinner).
3. More
3. To keep the vibe friendly, they chose a round table and antique chairs covered in simple linen and checked fabrics. A dainty scalloped edge on the chairs and table topper adds a decorative touch.
"But? What? Back up a minute here lady," you might be saying to yourself right at this very minute, "You just knowingly had a kid with Down Syndrome, didn't you?"
Tickled Pink Stamps is an Australian based online company that stocks a range of popular and well sought after stamps from many companies all over the world and is always so excited to be supplying you with everything cute, quirky and PINK... They now have their very own Lil Lolita and Lil Lads along with the cute Lil Pinkette range. Tickled Pink Stamps is excited to be sponsoring the CLP Sketch Challenge blog.
Jade Blade
*sigh**
so regardless if you are having the best day possible,
This is a song I have been listening to that enables me to define "blessing" a little bit different. Listen to Laura Story's song titled, Blessings.
I slowly walked over to the bar cart and poured myself a copper delight. I raised an empty glass in her direction, asking if she wanted one herself. She shook her head. That was the extent of our communication.
Nintendo DS =20 bucks
Located on an uninhabited rock island off the coast of Koror in Palau, Jellyfish Lake is one of 70 saltwater lakes on this South Pacific archipelago that were once connected to the ocean, but are now cut off. It is notable for the millions of golden jellyfish which migrate horizontally across the lake daily.
José was born and raised in Honduras and is the son of a journalist. He writes thrillers, with a twist of romance added in. His works include novels in both English and Spanish, and short stories. He’s a member of the International Thriller Writers where he also serves as the Thriller Roundtable Coordinator.
The ideal solution is not just to reflexively tug on the electronic umbilical cord, but also, while doing so, to try to lend the client some perspective on the relative urgency of her issue. “Relative”, not to all of the other cases the attorney is handling — what could be more counterproductive than implying that you see this client’s case as less significant than those of other clients? — but to the rest of what the client has in her life. There will be times, sure, when a legal case will in fact be crucial to a client’s immediate well being. But for estate planners, at least, that is rare. Reassuring the client that you are taking her case seriously, while subtly suggesting that, because you are taking it seriously, she can afford to step away from it for a while and live life, is a humane and sensible way to foster both your own and your client’s sanity.
Page Count: 432
Incorporating two high-performance a-spherical optical elements within its optics, this ultra-wide-angle lens provides exceptional image-resolving power with outstanding brightness levels even at the edges, whilst keeping any aberrations to a minimum. All lens characteristics are optimized for digital photography, for instance - exclusive lens coatings are applied to optical elements, while anti-reflection materials are applied to the interior of the lens barrel. The result is a lens that brings out the full potential of the PENTAX 645D medium-format digital SLR camera.
It was made with cream cheese and it was cold....
2 Tablespoons spices and herbs - basil, oregano, caraway seeds - was todays choice
I can't help thinking that the Watney's brand is still so toxic after all these years that Roger's efforts to rehabilitate it are doomed to failure, although I say good luck to him. If I see it, I'll give it a try, but I suspect it's likely to be available only in the London area.
Fry in a medium frying pan, until golden brown. Let cool, and eat!
#69. schmoozing for free stuff on a girls' night
I would say no, zombies can't taste what they eat.
Christians are deceived by Zionism
Did you participate in the Henry Glass Designer Blog Hop?!? I did, some very lovely free projects and some lovely give aways! We have to post on the Henry Glass Blog next week all the designers and their special words next week for a chance at some BIG prizes!
Chills Heavenly pop hit NZ
“They provided an alternative to the mainstream, especially Michael as a frontman. The National wouldn’t have existed if REM hadn’t.”
2. The Story In Your Eyes
too waterworded,
2.If making crispy dosas the tava should be smoking hot and just spread the batter from little top to get the web like look in your dosas.
He rested his arm against the vehicle’s vibrating door, and his head against his palm. The aging Humvee’s engine rumbled violently; Its heavy growl could be heard all across the barren desert valley, like the mighty roar of an ancient beast, ready to die at any moment. The vehicle was a complete abomination, ancient and weary, mostly held together by the scrapped parts of other abandoned vehicles they’d come across in the wastes. Its rusting pickup doors were barely held together by worn ropes and rusting steel chains; with several now sun-dyed blankets tied across the roof and side windows to provide at least some protection from the desert’s unforgiving sun, but not quite enough to keep the heat from turning their only home into an unbearable oven.
After deciding on a pose and overall look for the Dread, the only thing left for completing the main body was to tidy up the conversion work and to add some suitable bits to achieve the chaos look I wanted. Here’s what I ended up with:
- Robbie, Sidmouth UK, 10/3/2012 19:35
Now for the spygate issue that was brought up again on ESPN today. I have not addressed this yet on my blog, so that is why I am doing now. It will be the only time I post about this because it is old news and not really important anymore. First, why is this still being brought up? It was 2007 when it happened yet people act like it’s still a current situation. As a Patriots fan, this is way beyond beating a dead horse. It was five years ago, move on. Also, when the haters say things like “they haven’t won anything since spygate hahaha” you pinheads that try this shit are desperate. Since spygate here is all the Patriots have done: win the AFC twice, win their division four times (the only time not winning was the year Brady got hurt), win at least 10 games in each season since, have an undefeated regular season, and have the most wins of any team in the league over that period. So if you don’t count all that then you are right they have not won anything. Anyone who wants to use logic understands what the deal is. It’s the crybaby losers who are still bitter about the Patriots beating their team years ago that are bitching. I guess they will never let go of this story because they they will never get over it. That and they are desperate to insult the Patriots so they hang on to this story. But like the saying goes “haters gonna hate.”
Christian Endeavor, “Cures,” and Early A.A.
I think this is going to be a new thing. I think I'm going to put together a list of a few things that seem like they're important enough that everyone should know and conduct a very non-scientific poll of what people really know about the economy and the state of things. This is either going to be very interesting or very depressing. Or both.
Ah, politics. You gotta love it, especially when the Rethugs start doing what Democrats seemed to have had a virtual patent on for so many elections, which is lock and load and shoot blindly in a circular firing squad.
Since the person with the illegal chicken coop is one of those doomsday types with several screws loose and the likely anonymous snitch is my old friend I am staying the hell out of this conflict. While I would love to haul ass away from this surreal collection of surface dwelling Morlocks the housing market is still in the tank where I live so I am having to hunker down and make do. Plus, the community pool does come in handy this time of year for my son and daughter. This just reaffirms my ultimate goal to get the heck out of Dodge whenever the kids are grown because right now it would not take much to convince myself a suburb of Kabul or Mogadishu would have friendlier and more rational people.
I remember growing up wondering what I would be a nurse , a teacher , a factory worker & so on.....
same since his visit to Gethsemane.
......a guest room) Haha!!!
For the moon-lit pass by the Aall-a mo,
The Devil below was ringing his knell.
I like the fact that Madeleine L'Engle never, ever talks down to children. She assumes children know a lot more than most adults seem to think.
Here's just a taste of the talent you will find on Dot's blog
Number one, lease only be romantic with girls that you know. Make sure you know her. If you barely know this girl, it is not time to bust out the wine and candles. It’s gonna freak her out. Wait until you’re actually dating to like put the romance moves on. But it couldn’t hurt you to keep watching this video. Number two, be personal in your romantic gesture. You wanna make it like specific to her, not just like some generic robot girl.
 Will make it ever easier for an even greater flood of their kind to get into the country, and will make it easier for all the illegal-alien criminals that are already here to be granted amnesty (and eventually, citizenship).
It is then that I realized that I had found someone new.
So what am I doing? Something between Doodle and Squat. The avatar.blend file from Machinimatrix SOMEhow no longer exports a DAE that the SL mesh viewer can recognize as a rigged mesh. Until Gaia Clary figures it out, I’m stuck. Even doing a normal avatar mesh.
Us: We love to sit and watch nature too, not sure that we could do it for 72 hours though. You’ve been all over the world, what has been your favorite place and where are you headed next?
PCW Tag Team Champions The Schmidt Brothers: Jack and Joe (R) vs The California Teacher’s Union: ‘Foul Pole’ Andy Golatta and Malibu Dusty (D)
This past week I counted calories, fat and sugar grams. I tried to eat things that gave me more bang for my buck so to speak. For instance when I felt snacky I ate almonds instead of a granola bar. More fat grams but better fat.
“I cannot tell you what it was;
The day came, she saw that the palace was filled with guests; soft sound of music was resonating from every corner. Dusk gathered, the lights first started to get lit in the rooms of the palace and then they started to go off one by one.
Olay WHITE RADIANCE Luminous Whitening Blocker SPF 50 PA+++ protects against UV rays and moisturizes the face and the neck. It provides dual protection, resisting UVA and UVB, which lasts long.
Despite the name of white peony, flowers can be several hues other than white depending upon the subspecies. There are rose-pink and scarlet varieties, as well as white peonies ornamented with other colors. White peonies can be either single, semi-double or fully double. Paeonia rubra, or red peony, is a separate herb.
I have just Noticed that its only 23hours left for my birthday. Cant belive it cuz i havent planned some big thing yet but it doesnt mean that i aint gonna celebrate or something, Come on, Its my Birthday soon. One day to go!
A boost to the use of photographs by the Church during the post World War 2 New Life Movement saw the formation of the Publicity Department and the appointment of Lindsay Crozier as the Church’s Photographer in 1950. The Photographic Unit operated until the late 1980s when it closed due to financial pressure. During the 37 years the unit produced a wonderful visual history in a variety of media highlighting the Church’s work throughout New Zealand and overseas. The records and catalogues they maintained eased the burden of identification in contrast to the earlier photographic record which required Donald to undertake considerable research to place them in context.
April, also known as Super-Save-A-Lot, sprang into action!
altogether, it was a good christmas. lots of time with the family and stuff.
Feel free to congratulate the happy couple!!!
It's just fab, whether a Prison Fellowship volunteer or a paid prison chaplain to know that we are engaged in helping our Lord Jesus with his own personal mission statement.
It's a scary thing, that. Trusting yourself. No one wants to admit out loud that they've ignored someone's advice because they believe HIS/HER way is better. It sort of comes off as asshole-ish, doesn't it? You've asked your readers for opinions, they gave them, and in the end, you decided to disregard what they had to say on a particular point. I know we all send out critiques with the caveat that the writer can take or leave our comments... but do we really want to be ignored? NO. WE are right.
b) Then by abiding in God in mind and heart, endeavour to, fulfil in body the duties and affairs which your station in life imposes upon you.
Gideon’s Corpse by Preston and Child
I’ve listened to debates in the House of Commons and the Council Chamber long enough to know one thing: ultimately, modern Conservatives believe they have a natural right to govern. But they don’t really believe in the role of government, local or national. For them everything is nanny state.
I found a photo of a replica of Deckards pistol (I guess, I never even noticed what it looked like in the film) and vectorized it. This graphic is really just a placeholder. Any suggestions on a better image? I could use an eye, to allude to the opening of the film and the VOIGHT-COMP test used on the replicants, which focuses on eye movements.
“We have such an overwhelming experience with architecture that we don’t think about it, it’s omnipresent,” Faler said. “So here, I’m just trying to re-tilt the scales and bring the viewer back into the world that they already live in. I’m changing the material to give some sort of sensorial reaction to something you would never have a sensorial reaction to, like a piece of wood. I shift the material and hope that it triggers some sort of idea of memory and idea of your personal interaction with not only soap, but architecture.”
The first amazing and most profitable tool is LISTENING. There are two types of listening: Passive and Active.
more details at www.mettadance.org
1. Preheat the oven to 200 degree C.
Just give it a nice little haircut to your desired length. I didn’t want to cut mine too short because I want the grass to show enough around the eggs, but I also wanted it to be short enough that my wreath didn’t have its hair blowing in the wind like an 80s rock star.
EastEnders: Lorna Fitzgerald (Abi Branning) - WINNER
and trying to share it with others.
But mostly, I am just really, really, really mad at him for the damage he has done to our daughters.
I took the kids into the City today. Just before hitting Penn Station, an elderly man made his way onto the train. It was already standing room but I knew we were taking one more seat than necessary so I quietly told my daughter to move closer, that an older gentleman would likely sit down. I watched as he combed the aisles for a seat, stopping suddenly in front of us.
It's time for Scrapbookers Anonymous March Challenge... It's really a fun one.. ~ Sticker Collage... Create a collage out of stash items and use at least 11 different stickers mixed
Khostov jerked with the impact, but he did not fall or cry out. He instead took a step closer to Stolik. “Your fellows did the same thing, you know. You Germans – utterly lacking in creativity.”
Yet they remained top throughout and five wins and a draw in April, culminating with this one at Stamford Bridge, saw them crowned Champions once more.
Disclaimer 1:
Ajen Sita, Managing Partner: Africa at Ernst & Young comments “Despite high optimism, high growth and high returns, the perception gap still exists and the African continent as a whole still attracts fewer FDI projects than India and far fewer than China. There is still clearly work to be done by Africans – government and private sector alike – to better articulate and “sell” the growth story and investment opportunity for foreign investors.”
Fossil Watches
But now he's gone and we're through
This is our God, Creator, Christ and Holy Spirit, and we are God’s people.
One quoted Eleanor Roosevelt: 'The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams'. One reader offered insights into which countries might be best born into and advised: 'Perchance you be born in the "Land of the Free", there is still a simple solution for you and your family: pack your bags and emigrate to Denmark.'
I woke up again this morning to work out.
Now, it is not unreasonable for Thrall’s friends and constituents to want him to settle down with a proper orc woman. However, it is unreasonable to expect him to do so. Thrall is not your typical orc. He’s certainly not your typical Mag’har orc, though Aggra seems to wish to change that. He’s not going to bonk a suitable mate over the head and drag her back to his cave (no, this isn’t Mag’har customs, I’m simply using a convenient metaphor), because he hasn’t been raised around that behavior. He was raised around humans. When he finally reached orc-kind, they were suffering from a malaise and withdrawal from demonic powers — very few of them were still in line with old traditions, especially after fighting for years at the Burning Legion’s behest.
I recieved a lovely package in the post today! So rare but so nice to get something other than bills or double glazing ads!
The whole experience was entirely surreal, and it's going to be hard to put into words how we all felt. I'll give it a shot.
the butterfly is from a Pion paper and the sentiment is by Whimsy,
So it shouldn't have come as a huge surprise when yesterday, at the end of one of my infrequent sessions at the Club Med Gym (or Club Merde as it is known amongst locals for the semi-permanent stench of shit that hangs like a pall over the change rooms) the receptionist handed back my card with a complimentary bar of chocolate.
So, the weekend we checked out the chinchilla was your average summer day in sunny California. Seeing as how these little crepuscular rodents are native to the Andes, taking it out to play in the backyard on a summer afternoon should probably have been pointedly dissuaded by the Pet Library.
In addition to the silver, Taxco is just an unbelievably beautiful town. Technically I suppose it's a city, but with the narrow cobbled streets, popular buggy cars, and trees and gardens, it has a very "town" feel. It's built on the sides of the mountains, which in Mexico are high and rocky and beautiful. All the houses are whitewashed and red-shingled in the Spanish style, with terraces and elaborate ironwork gates. Actually, most everything there is done in the Spanish style, including the cathedral, which was built and transported stone by stone from Salamanca.
Now for more inspiration, pop on over to StampFairy World and see the fun creations from the StampFairies today. You'll love what you see there! Have a great day!
Ah, Ok I know this entry has been sooo super sad and depressing so I'm sorry if you are in a puddle of snot and tears. To end on a high note I have officially lost 20 lbs. Yes I said it 20 lbs....and I'm still going. I would like to lose (ideally) another 20, but I'll be happy with another 15. I just can't wait to fit into my old clothes and for Cancun...T minus 26 days and counting!!....I am going to drink a margarita the size of my head....Ole!
1. Egypt's Great Pyramids,
Join us at the Ice Den (Bell/101) on Thursday, May 10th from 7-9PM*
You make me most glad that I share my world with you. You are very welcome!
I was a nervous wreck. With every passing minute, I found myself becoming more and more uneasy. Nurses were coming in and out of the waiting room calling names, and my heart would race each time. Around 9:15, I heard my name being called, and I swear all the color drained from my face. I was able to take one family member back with me in Pre-Op, so Kevin was my man :)
Have a great weekend
Shit, he’s the Mayor of the town….. if anyone can get them moved he’s the man!
And although it has been almost twelve years since conflict broke out between the two, will this cause another war? And how many deaths does it take to make both parties realize we must come up with better conflict resolution. It is clear that the peace treaty signed by both parties is not respected.
Audrey is our lovely host this week and she has chosen this beautiful photo for us all to be inspired by --
and if I reach 500 followers before Monday, April 30, then I will donate a second $15 gift card to a second winner!
You’re welcome and Happy Sunday.
There was nothing identifiable about the covered body. Looking at the bulges at either end, one could not tell which was head and which was feet.
Winner, Lumiere Award 2001 – Best Director
because no one ever knows
Beautiful. But, do you see how it is too long? She would trip over it all night or get it torn my other dancers stepping on it (there are about 1000 dancers in all). So, off to hem.
Hayley Stark’s (Ellen Page) a smart, charming teenage girl – but even smart girls make mistakes. She’s hooking up in a coffee shop with Jeff Kohlver (Patrick Wilson), a guy she’s met on the internet. And even though he’s a cute, smooth high-end fashion photographer in his early 30s, Hayley shouldn’t be suggesting that the two of them go back to his house alone. When they get there, Hayley quickly finds some vodka and starts mixing screwdrivers. She even suggests a photo shoot and strips off some clothing. Everything is going well for Jeff… until his vision blurs and fades, and he passes out. What happens after this is all hell breaking loose as Hayley rains a terror on Jeff.
A wee stop at Nance's gallery, Nance wasn't there but Donald was in his festive orange checked shirt, and Kyushu for dinner. The missus has decided edamame is a new addiction, and I renewed my addiction to wasabe sauce. Do you know wasabe sauce? It is a light green dragon of a hot paste you put onto your veggie sushi roll and it CLEARS out your nasal passages like a dpepth charge...
In bottle: Pink, sweet, girly and pink!
The Idiot's Lantern
I love the soft socks to keep my feet warm, the adorable notepad I keep in my teacher bag for "to do" lists! That box is too precious for words and I'm thinking I'm going to keep my nail polish in it! =) And you better believe those Reese hearts are gone! haha =) It didn't take me long to eat them all! And my favorite color is TEAL so that picture frame was perfect!!! (It made my gift to my exchange partner look pitiful!)
After you've wrapped for what seems like an eternity, you'll come to the end, hooray! Of course, the smaller the shape, the easier it is. Shamrocks have a lot of twist and turns which makes it quite long to make. The hearts were much quicker to make.
Fortune Hunters is the second novella in Ava March’s Brook Street trilogy (I will be reviewing the third novella, Rogues, very soon). But you don’t need to have read the first novella to understand and enjoy this one.
It wouldn’t be smart for us to go home and wait for labor to progress when the risk of infection was there. In those moments, I was 100% crushed. I really did not want to have our baby in that hospital. I felt like all of the preparation and work I’d done over my pregnancy was for nothing and it was a really depressing half hour or so for me. Kara left Jake
Mince the parsley in the food processor using the chopping blade and pulsing. Put minced parsley in the big mixing bowl, remove chopping blade, put on slicing blade.
So, I know that I have it pretty easy. I at least have a little world experience to acknowledge that fact. I am not complaining – I’m whinging a little, but I’m not really complaining. I just need a steam vent on occasion and a kick up the backside that reminds me how good life really is.
It's finally Friday! Daddy celebrated his day off by joining a friend for a much needed guy's day. Daddy and Mike Myers (yes that is really his name) went fishing in ocean kayaks in the Chesapeake Bay. They didn't have any luck but had a great time!
or merely gray?
While I love the shape and substantial size, I was never quite happy with how they looked behind the sofa. If the console table were taller, then you could truly appreciate the cool shape of the lamp bases. But it's not, and I'm not replacing it (making over this room with existing pieces, remember?). And now that the bookcases are white, the lamps seem to get lost against them and the light walls. Or maybe they are a nice blend?
38. The Extraordinary Secrets of April, May, & June Robin Benway
I need to get over it and get on with it. This is my reality and I have to deal with it.
Writing my blog entry for the Insecure Writer's Support Group last Wednesday got me thinking.
I have nothing against atheists, not in a general sense, anyway. People are welcome to believe as they will, as long as they don’t try to force their beliefs on the rest of us. I take issue with specific individuals of any belief who do things out of malice or spite.
Distress Ink in Antique Linen (Ranger)
That next semester I decided to try something different. If teaching something I found boring made for a boring class, then why not teach something I enjoyed. (I know not everyone has this ability, Math teachers have to teach Math) I chose outdoor education. I had grand plans for this class. I wanted to take my students on hikes. I wanted them to love hiking, like I love hiking.
Aaw honey, wipe those tears from your eyes. Yes, yes, you’re devastated after realizing that you’ve been a fool for the whole year. It’s okay. You’ll be better in 2011. The quit-smoking resolution wouldn’t be as easy as you think, but you’ll get there somehow!
The easiest and most efficient way to find out what types of financial aid you qualify for is to fill out the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA). You can apply online and after a short waiting period, you will receive a document that indicates exactly what types of financial aid you qualify for. But there are deadlines for the FAFSA so be sure to stay up-to- date so you do not miss out.
Animal Husbandry by The Hickoids
Winner of Bethesda Fountain note-cards is Kwana randomly selected number 5. (I do not include myself)
So, Yesterday, I had this great idea: I’ll start a blog about writing. Today, I sat down and was hit with a pretty major detail that I hadn’t quite worked out yet.
Ang says he makes it a point to communicate with the sales advisors, all 700 of them, on the importance of staying ahead and being able to adapt to the changes, especially in times of challenges.
I like land around me. A small house is fine by me, but when my neighbour sneezes, I don't want to have to wipe my windows. I'm modest in my needs.
Will I give you good, memorable Christmases and Birthdays?
There ya go - it's all over but for the whiners and gripers. We won; the war is over.
On the top left of the blog is a Paypal button which can be used (until I can get a separate account sorted later tonight) to make donations to INTERSECT. If you'd like to give anything you can to help this conference go ahead, please, please do. (This is currently my personal Paypal account, the balance pre-publishing is £0.00, so as soon as I set up a new account I will immediately transfer all funds to it and create a separate button)
My hair was beginning to get pretty upset at this point, so I went back
Check out the amazing Teaching Guide provided by Sylvan Dell Publishing! There are lots of wonderful activities to use with children in collaboration with this story that will make it a hit among your curriculum or just as a resource when sharing the story with your own children!
in goggles and swimming costumes
Heat 1 tablespoon of fat in a heavy cast-iron skillet over medium-high heat.
You win again Brain…
The Book of Mormon is the word of God, like the Bible. It is Holy Scripture, with form and content similar to that of the Bible. Both books contain God's guidance as revealed to prophets as well as religious histories of different civilizations. While the Bible is written by and about the people in the land of Israel and surrounding areas, and takes place from the creation of the world until shortly after the death of Jesus Christ, the Book of Mormon contains the history and God’s dealings with the people who lived in the Americas between approximately 600 BC and 400 AD. The prophets in the Book of Mormon recorded God's dealings with His people, which were compiled by a prophet named Mormon onto gold plates.
Orange Chicken (in blue, as Kyo): What?
Next, we surprised ourselves by agreeing to be interviewed for HGTV. It took a little longer than expected, because I kept forgetting to insert "HGTV" in to every sentence. Seriously!
Pancakes are definitely a fave breakfast here! After enjoying them for breakfast, there are always extras. Storing these delicious extra pancakes in the freezer to locate on another busy AM is a great plus! Who has time to make pancakes every time a family member dreams of them for breakfast???
When Levi says that flat ontology means “that there is no one being that overdetermines all the rest“, yes, I couldn’t agree more. But the whole reason for this, at least historically, is the attempt to secularize philosophy. Getting rid of the ding-an-sich is all about exorcizing the hidden hypostatizations in the machine, right? And there are politico-ethical reasons for this. Levi may not have this in mind, but the philosophical tradition certainly does, as it thinks ‘through us’, so to speak. But to argue that, “Flat ontology is not a normative or ethical claim. When flat ontology places objects on equal footing the point is not that all beings are to be treated equally in the political or ethical sense” seems to me to deemphasize the implicit ethics implied by any and all philosophical claims. For in a sense, to say that all is flat is shorthand for, ‘how might our world be different if everyone saw things as flat’. Otherwise, why write philosophy? Why not simply decide for oneself that all is flat, and take that secret to the grave? Why try to convince others, if there’s not an ethical/political set of implications? Is it possible to defend any epistemo-ontological claim without using value judgements to do so? Isn’t then all epistemology/ontology implicitly ethico-political?
